Syria - Wikipedia
Jump to content Main menu Main menu move to sidebar hide Navigation Main page Contents Current events Random article About Wikipedia Contact us Donate Contribute Help Learn to edit Community portal Recent changes Upload file Search Search Create account Log in Personal tools Create account Log in Pages for logged out editors learn more Contributions Talk Contents move to sidebar hide Top 
1 Etymology 
2 History Toggle History subsection 
2.1 Ancient antiquity 
2.2 Classical antiquity 
2.3 Middle Ages 
2.4 Ottoman Syria 
2.5 French Mandate 
2.6 Independent Syrian Republic 
2.7 Baathist Syria 
2.8 Baathist Syria under Assad 
2.9 Current political situation Syrian Civil War 
3 Geography Toggle Geography subsection 
3.1 Biodiversity 
4 Government and politics Toggle Government and politics subsection 
4.1 Administrative divisions 

4.1.1 Autonomous Administration of North and East Syria 
4.2 Foreign relations 

4.2.1 International disputes 
4.3 Military 
4.4 Human rights 
4.5 Agrarian reform 
5 Economy Toggle Economy subsection 
5.1 Drug industry 
5.2 Petroleum industry 
5.3 Transport 
5.4 Internet and telecommunications 
5.5 Water supply and sanitation 
6 Demographics Toggle Demographics subsection 
6.1 Largest cities 
6.2 Ethnic groups 
6.3 Languages 
6.4 Religion 
6.5 Education 
6.6 Health 
7 Culture Toggle Culture subsection 
7.1 Literature 
7.2 Music 
7.3 Media 
7.4 Cuisine 
8 See also 
9 References Toggle References subsection 
9.1 Notes 
9.2 Citations 
9.3 General references 
10 Further reading 
11 External links Toggle the table of contents Syria 250 languages Ach   Afrikaans Alemannisch  Anarkiel  nglisc   Aragons   Arpetan  Asturianu  Avae  Azrbaycanca  Basa Bali Bamanankan    Bnlmg      Bikol Central Bislama  Boarisch  Bosanski Brezhoneg  Catal  Cebuano etina Chavacano de Zamboanga ChiShona ChiTumbuka Corsu Cymraeg Dansk  Davvismegiella Deutsch  Din bizaad Dolnoserbski  Eesti  Espaol Esperanto Estremeu Euskara  Fiji Hindi Froyskt Franais Frysk Fulfulde Gaeilge Gaelg Gagauz Gidhlig Galego Gky       Gychi Konknni Hakkng  Hausa Hawaii   Hornjoserbsce Hrvatski Ido Ilokano   Bahasa Indonesia Interlingua Interlingue  slenska Italiano  Jawa Kaby  Kapampangan  Kaszbsczi  Kernowek Ikinyarwanda Kiswahili  Kongo Kreyl ayisyen Kriyl gwiyannen Kurd Ladin Ladino Latina Latvieu Ltzebuergesch  Lietuvi Ligure Limburgs Lingla Lingua Franca Nova Livvinkarjala La .lojban. Lombard Magyar Madhur   Malagasy  Malti Mori     Bahasa Melayu   Minangkabau   Mngdngng Mirands    Nederlands Nedersaksies      Nordfriisk Norfuk  Pitkern Norsk bokml Norsk nynorsk Novial Occitan    Oromoo Ozbekcha     Pangcah  Papiamentu  Patois  Picard Piemontis Tok Pisin Plattdtsch Polski  Portugus Qaraqalpaqsha Qrmtatarca Romn Runa Simi     Sakizaya Gagana Samoa   Sardu Scots Seediq Shqip Sicilianu  Simple English  SiSwati Slovenina Slovenina    lnski Soomaaliga  Sranantongo   srpski Srpskohrvatski   Sunda Suomi Svenska Tagalog  Taqbaylit   tatara  Tayal  Tetun    Lea fakaTonga Trke Trkmene Twi Tyap  Basa Ugi     Uyghurche Vahcuengh Vneto Vepsn kel Ting Vit Volapk Vro Walon  WestVlams Winaray Wolof  Xitsonga  Yorb  Zazaki Zeuws emaitka  Toli   Edit links Article Talk English Read View source View history Tools Tools move to sidebar hide Actions Read View source View history General What links here Related changes Upload file Special pages Permanent link Page information Cite this page Get shortened URL Download QR code Wikidata item Printexport Download as PDF Printable version In other projects Wikimedia Commons Wikibooks Wikinews Wikiquote Wikivoyage Coordinates 
35 N 
38 E  
35 N 
38 E  35 38 From Wikipedia the free encyclopedia Country in West Asia This article is about the modern state of Syria. For other uses see Syria disambiguation. Syrian Arab Republic    Arabic alJumhriyya alArabiyya asSriya Flag Coat of arms Motto    Wada urriyya Ishtirkiyya Unity Freedom Socialism Anthem   umt adDiyr Guardians of the Homeland Syria proper shown in dark green Syrias territorial claims over the Turkish Hatay Province and the Israelioccupied Golan Heights shown in light greenShow globe Show map of Syria Capital and largest city Damascus 33
30 N 36
18 E  
33.5 
00 N 
36.3 
00 E  
33.5 00 
36.3 00 Official languages Arabic1 Ethnic groups 20232 7475 Arabs 
9.5 10 Kurds 15
16.5  Others including Turkomans Assyrians Circassians Armenians and others23 Religion 20232 87 Islam 74 Sunni 10 Alawite 3 Shia 10 Christianity 3 Druze Demonyms Syrian Government Unitary presidential republic4 under a totalitarian5 hereditary dictatorship  President Bashar alAssad  Vice President Najah alAttar  Prime Minister Hussein Arnous  Speaker of the Peoples Assembly Hammouda Sabbagh Legislature Peoples Assembly Establishment  Arab Kingdom of Syria 8 March 1920  State of Syria under French mandate 1 December 1924  Syrian Republic 14 May 1930  De jure independence 24 October 1945  De facto independence 17 April 1946  Left the United Arab Republic 28 September 1961  Baath Party takes power 8 March 1963  Current constitution 27 February 2012 Area  Total 1851806 km2 71500 sq mi 
87 th  Water  
1.1  Population  2024 estimate 238654237 
58 th  Density 1
18.3 km2 3
06.4 sq mi 
70 th GDP PPP 2015 estimate  Total 
50.2 8 billion8  Per capita 29008 GDP nominal 2020 estimate  Total 
11.0 8 billion8  Per capita 533 Gini 2014 
55.8 9 high HDI 2022 
0.5 5710 medium 1
57 th Currency Syrian pound SYP Time zone UTC3 Arabia Standard Time Date format ddmmyyyy AD Driving side right Calling code 963 ISO 3166 code SY Internet TLD .sy . Syriaa officially the Syrian Arab Republicb is a country in West Asia located in the Eastern Mediterranean and the Levant. It is bounded by the Mediterranean Sea to the west Turkey to the north Iraq to the east and southeast Jordan to the south and Israel and Lebanon to the southwest. Cyprus lies to the west across the Mediterranean Sea. It is a unitary republic that consists of 14 governorates subdivisions. A country of fertile plains high mountains and deserts Syria is home to diverse ethnic and religious groups including the majority Arabs Kurds Turkmens Assyrians Circassians Armenians Albanians Greeks and Chechens. Religious groups include Muslims Christians Alawites Druze and Yazidis. The capital and largest city is Damascus followed by Aleppo Homs Latakia Hama Deirezor and Raqqa. Arabs are the largest ethnic group and Sunni Muslims are the largest religious group. Syria is now the only country that is governed by Baathists who advocate Arab socialism and Arab nationalism. The name Syria historically referred to a wider region broadly synonymous with the Levant and known in Arabic as alSham. The modern state encompasses the sites of several ancient kingdoms and empires including the Eblan civilization of the 
3 rd millennium BC. In the Islamic era Damascus was the seat of the Umayyad Caliphate and a provincial capital of the Mamluk Sultanate in Egypt. The modern Syrian state was established in the mid
20 th century after centuries of Ottoman rule. After a period as a French mandate 19231946 the newly created state represented the largest Arab state to emerge from the formerly Ottomanruled Syrian provinces. It gained de jure independence as a democratic parliamentary republic on 24 October 1945 when the Republic of Syria became a founding member of the United Nations an act which legally ended the former French mandate although French troops did not leave the country until April 1946. The postindependence period was tumultuous with multiple military coups and coup attempts shaking the country between 1949 and 1971. In 1958 Syria entered a brief union with Egypt called the United Arab Republic which was terminated by the 1961 Syrian coup dtat. The republic was renamed as the Arab Republic of Syria in late 1961 after the December 1 constitutional referendum of that year. A significant event was the 1963 coup dtat carried out by the military committee of the Arab Socialist Baath Party which established a oneparty state. It ran Syria under emergency law from 1963 to 2011 effectively suspending constitutional protections for citizens. Internal powerstruggles within Baathist factions caused further coups in 1966 and 1970 which eventually resulted in the seizure of power by General Hafiz alAssad. Assad assigned Alawite loyalists to key posts in the armed forces bureaucracy Mukhabarat and the ruling elite effectively establishing an Alawi minority rule to consolidate power within his family. After the death of Hafiz alAssad in 2000 his son Bashar alAssad inherited the presidency and political system centered around a cult of personality to the alAssad family. The Baath regime is a totalitarian dictatorship that has been internationally condemned for its political repression alongside its numerous human rights abuses including summary executions massive censorship forced disappearances massmurders barrelbombings chemical attacks and other warcrimes. Following its violent suppression of the Arab Spring protests of the 2011 Syrian Revolution the Syrian government was suspended from the Arab League in November 2011 for over 11 years until its reinstatement in 2023. Since July 2011 Syria has been embroiled in a multisided civil war with involvement of different countries.c As of 2020 three political entities  the Syrian Interim Government Syrian Salvation Government and Autonomous Administration of North and East Syria  have emerged in Syrian territory to challenge Assads rule. Syria is a member of the NonAligned Movement and the Arab League. Being ranked 
3 rd last on the 2022 Global Peace Index and 
5 th highest in the 2023 Fragile States Index1213 It is one of the most violent countries in the world. The country is amongst the most dangerous places for journalism and is ranked 
6 th worst in 2023 World Press Freedom Index.1415 Syria is the most corrupt country in the MENA region and was ranked the 
2 nd lowest globally on the 2022 Corruption Perceptions Index.d The country has also become the epicentre of a statesponsored multibillion dollar illicit drug cartel the largest in the world. The civil war has killed more than 570000 people with proAssad forces causing more than 90 of the total civilian casualties.e The war led to refugee crisis with an estimated 
7.6  million internally displaced people July 2015 UNHCR figure and over 5 million refugees July 2017 registered by UNHCR24 making population assessment difficult in recent years. The war has also worsened economic conditions with more than 90 of the population living in poverty and 80 facing food insecurity.f Etymology Main article Name of Syria Several sources indicate that the name Syria is derived from the 
8 th century BC Luwian term Surai and the derivative ancient Greek name  Srioi or  Sroi both of which originally derived from Ar Assyria in northern Mesopotamia presentday Iraq.2930 However from the Seleucid Empire 323150 BC this term was also applied to the Levant31 and from this point the Greeks applied the term without distinction between the Assyrians of Mesopotamia and Arameans of the Levant.3233 Mainstream modern academic opinion strongly favors the argument that the Greek word is related to the cognate  Assyria ultimately derived from the Akkadian Aur.34 The Greek name appears to correspond to Phoenician r Assur rym Assyrians recorded in the 
8 th century BC ineky inscription.35 The area designated by the word has changed over time. Classically Syria lies at the eastern end of the Mediterranean between Arabia to the south and Asia Minor to the north stretching inland to include parts of Iraq and having an uncertain border to the northeast that Pliny the Elder describes as including from west to east Commagene Sophene and Adiabene.36 By Plinys time however this larger Syria had been divided into a number of provinces under the Roman Empire but politically independent from each other Judaea later renamed Palaestina in AD 135 the region corresponding to modernday Israel the Palestinian Territories and Jordan in the extreme southwest Phoenice established in AD 194 corresponding to modern Lebanon Damascus and Homs regions CoeleSyria or Hollow Syria and south of the Eleutheris river.37 History Main article History of Syria Ancient antiquity Female figurine 5000 BC. Ancient Orient Museum. Since approximately 10000 BC Syria was one of the centers of Neolithic culture known as PrePottery Neolithic A where agriculture and cattle breeding first began to appear. The Neolithic period PPNB is represented by rectangular houses of Mureybet culture. At the time of the prepottery Neolithic people used containers made of stone gyps and burnt lime Vaisselle blanche. The discovery of obsidian tools from Anatolia are evidence of early trade. The ancient cities of Hamoukar and Emar played an important role during the late Neolithic and Bronze Age. Archaeologists have demonstrated that civilization in Syria was one of the most ancient on earth perhaps preceded by only that of Mesopotamia. The earliest recorded indigenous civilization in the region was the Kingdom of Ebla38 near presentday Idlib northern Syria. Ebla appears to have been founded around 3500 BC3940414243 and gradually built its fortune through trade with the Mesopotamian states of Sumer Assyria and Akkad as well as with the Hurrian and Hattian peoples to the northwest in Asia Minor.44 Gifts from Pharaohs found during excavations confirm Eblas contact with Egypt. IshqiMari king of the Second Kingdom of Mari circa 2300 BC. One of the earliest written texts from Syria is a trading agreement between Vizier Ibrium of Ebla and an ambiguous kingdom called Abarsal c. 2300 BC.4546 Scholars believe the language of Ebla to be among the oldest known written Semitic languages after Akkadian. Recent classifications of the Eblaite language have shown that it was an East Semitic language closely related to the Akkadian language.47 Ebla was weakened by a long war with Mari and the whole of Syria became part of the Mesopotamian Akkadian Empire after Sargon of Akkad and his grandson NaramSins conquests ended Eblan domination over Syria in the first half of the 
23 rd century BC.4849 By the 
21 st century BC Hurrians settled the northern east parts of Syria while the rest of the region was dominated by the Amorites. Syria was called the Land of the Amurru Amorites by their AssyroBabylonian neighbors. The Northwest Semitic language of the Amorites is the earliest attested of the Canaanite languages. Mari reemerged during this period and saw renewed prosperity until conquered by Hammurabi of Babylon. Ugarit also arose during this time circa 1800 BC close to modern Latakia. Ugaritic was a Semitic language loosely related to the Canaanite languages and developed the Ugaritic alphabet50 considered to be the worlds earliest known alphabet. The Ugaritic kingdom survived until its destruction at the hands of the marauding IndoEuropean Sea Peoples in the 
12 th century BC in what was known as the Late Bronze Age Collapse which saw similar kingdoms and states witness the same destruction at the hand of the Sea Peoples. Aleppo and the capital city Damascus are among the oldest continuously inhabited cities in the world.51 Yamhad modern Aleppo dominated northern Syria for two centuries52 although Eastern Syria was occupied in the 
19 th and 
18 th centuries BC by the Old Assyrian Empire ruled by the Amorite Dynasty of ShamshiAdad I and by the Babylonian Empire which was founded by Amorites. Yamhad was described in the tablets of Mari as the mightiest state in the near east and as having more vassals than Hammurabi of Babylon.52 Yamhad imposed its authority over Alalakh53 Qatna54 the Hurrians states and the Euphrates Valley down to the borders with Babylon.55 The army of Yamhad campaigned as far away as Dr on the border of Elam modern Iran.56 Yamhad was conquered and destroyed along with Ebla by the IndoEuropean Hittites from Asia Minor circa 1600 BC.57 From this time Syria became a battle ground for various foreign empires these being the Hittite Empire Mitanni Empire Egyptian Empire Middle Assyrian Empire and to a lesser degree Babylonia. The Egyptians initially occupied much of the south while the Hittites and the Mitanni much of the north. However Assyria eventually gained the upper hand destroying the Mitanni Empire and annexing huge swathes of territory previously held by the Hittites and Babylon. Syrians bringing presents to Pharaoh Tuthmosis III as depicted in the tomb of Rekhmire circa 1450 BCE actual painting and interpretational drawing. They are labeled Chiefs of Retjenu.5859 Around the 
14 th century BC various Semitic peoples appeared in the area such as the seminomadic Suteans who came into an unsuccessful conflict with Babylonia to the east and the West Semitic speaking Arameans who subsumed the earlier Amorites. They too were subjugated by Assyria and the Hittites for centuries. The Egyptians fought the Hittites for control over western Syria the fighting reached its zenith in 1274 BC with the Battle of Kadesh.6061 The west remained part of the Hittite empire until its destruction c. 1200 BC62 while eastern Syria largely became part of the Middle Assyrian Empire63 who also annexed much of the west during the reign of TiglathPileser I 11141076 BC. With the destruction of the Hittites and the decline of Assyria in the late 
11 th century BC the Aramean tribes gained control of much of the interior founding states such as Bit Bahiani AramDamascus Hamath AramRehob AramNaharaim and Luhuti. From this point the region became known as Aramea or Aram. There was also a synthesis between the Semitic Arameans and the remnants of the IndoEuropean Hittites with the founding of a number of SyroHittite states centered in north central Aram Syria and south central Asia Minor modern Turkey including Palistin Carchemish and Samal. Amrit Phoenician Temple A Canaanite group known as the Phoenicians came to dominate the coasts of Syria and also Lebanon and northern Palestine from the 
13 th century BC founding city states such as Amrit Simyra Arwad Paltos Ramitha and Shuksi. From these coastal regions they eventually spread their influence throughout the Mediterranean including building colonies in Malta Sicily the Iberian peninsula modern Spain and Portugal and the coasts of North Africa and most significantly founding the major city state of Carthage in modern Tunisia in the 
9 th century BC which was much later to become the center of a major empire rivaling the Roman Republic. Syria and the Western half of Near East then fell to the vast Neo Assyrian Empire 911 BC  605 BC. The Assyrians introduced Imperial Aramaic as the lingua franca of their empire. This language was to remain dominant in Syria and the entire Near East until after the Arab Islamic conquest in the 
7 th and 
8 th centuries AD and was to be a vehicle for the spread of Christianity. The Assyrians named their colonies of Syria and Lebanon EberNari. Assyrian domination ended after the Assyrians greatly weakened themselves in a series of brutal internal civil wars followed by attacks from the Medes Babylonians Chaldeans Persians Scythians and Cimmerians. During the fall of Assyria the Scythians ravaged and plundered much of Syria. The last stand of the Assyrian army was at Carchemish in northern Syria in 605 BC. The Assyrian Empire was followed by the NeoBabylonian Empire 605 BC  539 BC. During this period Syria became a battle ground between Babylonia and another former Assyrian colony that of Egypt. The Babylonians like their Assyrian relations were victorious over Egypt. Classical antiquity Main articles EberNari CoeleSyria Roman Syria and Syria Palaestina Ancient city of Palmyra before the war NeoBabylonian Empire at its greatest territorial extent. Roman Theatre at Palmyra Lands that constitute modern day Syria were part of the NeoBabylonian Empire and had been annexed by the Achaemenid Empire in 539 BC. Led by Cyrus the Great the Achaemenid Persians retained Imperial Aramaic as one of the diplomatic languages of their empire 539 BC  330 BC as well as the Assyrian name for the new satrapy of AramSyria EberNari. Syria was later conquered by the Greek Macedonian Empire which was ruled by Alexander the Great c. 330 BC and consequently became CoeleSyria province of the Greek Seleucid Empire 323 BC  64 BC with the Seleucid kings styling themselves King of Syria and the city of Antioch being its capital starting from 240. Thus it was the Greeks who introduced the name Syria to the region. Originally an IndoEuropean corruption of Assyria in northern Mesopotamia Iraq the Greeks used this term to describe not only Assyria itself but also the lands to the west which had for centuries been under Assyrian dominion.64 Thus in the GrecoRoman world both the Arameans of Syria and the Assyrians of Mesopotamia modern day Iraq to the east were referred to as Syrians or Syriacs despite these being distinct peoples in their own right a confusion which would continue into the modern world. Eventually parts of southern Seleucid Syria were taken by Judean Hasmoneans upon the slow disintegration of the Hellenistic Empire. Syria briefly came under Armenian control from 83 BC with the conquests of the Armenian king Tigranes the Great who was welcomed as a savior from the Seleucids and Romans by the Syrian people. However Pompey the Great a general of the Roman Empire rode to Syria and captured Antioch its capital and turned Syria into a Roman province in 64 BC thus ending Armenian control over the region which had lasted two decades. Syria prospered under Roman rule being strategically located on the silk road which gave it massive wealth and importance making it the battleground for the rivaling Romans and Persians. Roman Theatre at Bosra in the province of Arabia presentday Syria Temple of Jupiter Damascus Palmyra a rich and sometimes powerful native Aramaicspeaking kingdom arose in northern Syria in the 
2 nd century the Palmyrene established a trade network that made the city one of the richest in the Roman empire. Eventually in the late 
3 rd century AD the Palmyrene king Odaenathus defeated the Persian emperor Shapur I and controlled the entirety of the Roman East while his successor and widow Zenobia established the Palmyrene Empire which briefly conquered Egypt Syria Palestine much of Asia Minor Judah and Lebanon before being finally brought under Roman control in 273 AD. The northern Mesopotamian Assyrian kingdom of Adiabene controlled areas of north east Syria between 10 AD and 117 AD before it was conquered by Rome.65 The Aramaic language has been found as far afield as Hadrians Wall in Ancient Britain66 with an inscription written by a Palmyrene emigrant at the site of Fort Arbeia.67 Control of Syria eventually passed from the Romans to the Byzantines with the split in the Roman Empire.44 The largely Aramaicspeaking population of Syria during the heyday of the Byzantine Empire was probably not exceeded again until the 
19 th century. Prior to the Arab Islamic Conquest in the 
7 th century AD the bulk of the population were Arameans but Syria was also home to Greek and Roman ruling classes Assyrians still dwelt in the north east Phoenicians along the coasts and Jewish and Armenian communities were also extant in major cities with Nabateans and preIslamic Arabs such as the Lakhmids and Ghassanids dwelling in the deserts of southern Syria. Syriac Christianity had taken hold as the major religion although others still followed Judaism Mithraism Manicheanism GrecoRoman Religion Canaanite Religion and Mesopotamian Religion. Syrias large and prosperous population made Syria one of the most important of the Roman and Byzantine provinces particularly during the 
2 nd and 
3 rd centuries AD.68 The ancient city of Apamea an important commercial center and one of Syrias most prosperous cities in classical antiquity Syrians held considerable amounts of power during the Severan dynasty. The matriarch of the family and Empress of Rome as wife of emperor Septimius Severus was Julia Domna a Syrian from the city of Emesa modern day Homs whose family held hereditary rights to the priesthood of the god ElGabal. Her great nephews also Arabs from Syria would also become Roman Emperors the first being Elagabalus and the second his cousin Alexander Severus. Another Roman emperor who was a Syrian was Philip the Arab Marcus Julius Philippus who was born in Roman Arabia. He was emperor from 244 to 24968 and ruled briefly during the Crisis of the Third Century. During his reign he focused on his home town of Philippopolis modern day Shahba and began many construction projects to improve the city most of which were halted after his death. Syria is significant in the history of Christianity Saulus of Tarsus better known as the Apostle Paul was converted on the Road to Damascus and emerged as a significant figure in the Christian Church at Antioch in ancient Syria from which he left on many of his missionary journeys. Acts 91
43 inappropriate external link Middle Ages Muhammads first interaction with the people and tribes of Syria was during the Invasion of Dumatul Jandal in July 62669 where he ordered his followers to invade Duma because Muhammad received intelligence that some tribes there were involved in highway robbery and preparing to attack Medina itself.70 William Montgomery Watt claims that this was the most significant expedition Muhammad ordered at the time even though it received little notice in the primary sources. Dumat AlJandal was 800 kilometres 500 mi from Medina and Watt says that there was no immediate threat to Muhammad other than the possibility that his communications to Syria and supplies to Medina being interrupted. Watt says It is tempting to suppose that Muhammad was already envisaging something of the expansion which took place after his death and that the rapid march of his troops must have impressed all those who heard of it.71 William Muir also believes that the expedition was important as Muhammad followed by 1000 men reached the confines of Syria where distant tribes had now learnt his name while the political horizon of Muhammad was extended.69 Umayyad fresco from Qasr alHayr alGharb built in the early 
7 th century By AD 640 Syria was conquered by the Arab Rashidun army led by Khalid ibn alWalid. In the mid
7 th century the Umayyad dynasty then rulers of the empire placed the capital of the empire in Damascus. The countrys power declined during later Umayyad rule this was mainly due to totalitarianism corruption and the resulting revolutions. The Umayyad dynasty was then overthrown in 750 by the Abbasid dynasty which moved the capital of empire to Baghdad. Arabic  made official under Umayyad rule72  became the dominant language replacing Greek and Aramaic of the Byzantine era. In 887 the Egyptbased Tulunids annexed Syria from the Abbasids and were later replaced by once the Egyptbased Ikhshidids and still later by the Hamdanids originating in Aleppo founded by Sayf alDawla.73 The 1299 Battle of Wadi alKhazandar. The Mongols under Ghazan defeated the Mamluks. Sections of Syria were held by French English Italian and German overlords between 1098 and 1189 AD during the Crusades and were known collectively as the Crusader states among which the primary one in Syria was the Principality of Antioch. The coastal mountainous region was also occupied in part by the Nizari Ismailis the socalled Assassins who had intermittent confrontations and truces with the Crusader States. Later in history when the Nizaris faced renewed Frankish hostilities they received timely assistance from the Ayyubids.74 After a century of Seljuk rule Syria was largely conquered 11751185 by the Kurdish liberator Salah adDin founder of the Ayyubid dynasty of Egypt. Aleppo fell to the Mongols of Hulegu in January 1260 and Damascus in March but then Hulegu was forced to break off his attack to return to China to deal with a succession dispute. A few months later the Mamluks arrived with an army from Egypt and defeated the Mongols in the Battle of Ain Jalut in Galilee. The Mamluk leader Baibars made Damascus a provincial capital. When he died power was taken by Qalawun. In the meantime an emir named Sunqur alAshqar had tried to declare himself ruler of Damascus but he was defeated by Qalawun on 21 June 1280 and fled to northern Syria. AlAshqar who had married a Mongol woman appealed for help from the Mongols. The Mongols of the Ilkhanate took Aleppo in October 1280 but Qalawun persuaded AlAshqar to join him and they fought against the Mongols on 29 October 1281 in the Second Battle of Homs which was won by the Mamluks.75 In 1400 the Muslim TurcoMongol conqueror Tamurlane invaded Syria in which he sacked Aleppo76 and captured Damascus after defeating the Mamluk army. The citys inhabitants were massacred except for the artisans who were deported to Samarkand.77 Tamurlane also conducted specific massacres of the Aramean and Assyrian Christian populations greatly reducing their numbers.78 By the end of the 
15 th century the discovery of a sea route from Europe to the Far East ended the need for an overland trade route through Syria. Syrian women 1683 Ottoman Syria Main article Ottoman Syria In 1516 the Ottoman Empire invaded the Mamluk Sultanate of Egypt conquering Syria and incorporating it into its empire. The Ottoman system was not burdensome to Syrians because the Turks respected Arabic as the language of the Quran and accepted the mantle of defenders of the faith. Damascus was made the major entrepot for Mecca and as such it acquired a holy character to Muslims because of the beneficial results of the countless pilgrims who passed through on the hajj the pilgrimage to Mecca.79 1803 Cedid Atlas showing Ottoman Syria labelled as Al Sham in yellow Ottoman administration followed a system that led to peaceful coexistence. Each ethnoreligious minorityArab Shia Muslim Arab Sunni Muslim ArameanSyriac Orthodox Greek Orthodox Maronite Christians Assyrian Christians Armenians Kurds and Jewsconstituted a millet.80 The religious heads of each community administered all personal status laws and performed certain civil functions as well.79 In 1831 Ibrahim Pasha of Egypt renounced his loyalty to the Empire and overran Ottoman Syria capturing Damascus. His shortterm rule over the domain attempted to change the demographics and social structure of the region he brought thousands of Egyptian villagers to populate the plains of Southern Syria rebuilt Jaffa and settled it with veteran Egyptian soldiers aiming to turn it into a regional capital and he crushed peasant and Druze rebellions and deported nonloyal tribesmen. By 1840 however he had to surrender the area back to the Ottomans. From 1864 Tanzimat reforms were applied on Ottoman Syria carving out the provinces vilayets of Aleppo Zor Beirut and Damascus Vilayet Mutasarrifate of Mount Lebanon was created as well and soon after the Mutasarrifate of Jerusalem was given a separate status. Armenian deportees near Aleppo during the Armenian genocide 1915 During World War I the Ottoman Empire entered the conflict on the side of Germany and the AustroHungarian Empire. It ultimately suffered defeat and loss of control of the entire Near East to the British Empire and French Empire. During the conflict genocide against indigenous Christian peoples was carried out by the Ottomans and their allies in the form of the Armenian genocide and Assyrian genocide of which Deir ezZor in Ottoman Syria was the final destination of these death marches.81 In the midst of World War I two Allied diplomats Frenchman Franois GeorgesPicot and Briton Mark Sykes secretly agreed on the postwar division of the Ottoman Empire into respective zones of influence in the SykesPicot Agreement of 1916. Initially the two territories were separated by a border that ran in an almost straight line from Jordan to Iran. However the discovery of oil in the region of Mosul just before the end of the war led to yet another negotiation with France in 1918 to cede this region to the British zone of influence which was to become Iraq. The fate of the intermediate province of Zor was left unclear its occupation by Arab nationalists resulted in its attachment to Syria. This border was recognized internationally when Syria became a League of Nations mandate in 192082 and has not changed to date. French Mandate Main articles Mandate for Syria and the Lebanon and Mandatory Syrian Republic The inauguration of President Hashim alAtassi in 1936 In 1920 a shortlived independent Kingdom of Syria was established under Faisal I of the Hashemite family. However his rule over Syria ended after only a few months following the Battle of Maysalun. French troops occupied Syria later that year after the San Remo conference proposed that the League of Nations put Syria under a French mandate. General Gouraud had according to his secretary de Caix two options Either build a Syrian nation that does not exist... by smoothing the rifts which still divide it or cultivate and maintain all the phenomena which require our arbitration that these divisions give. De Caix added I must say only the second option interests me. This is what Gouraud did.8384 In 1925 Sultan alAtrash led a revolt that broke out in the Druze Mountain and spread to engulf the whole of Syria and parts of Lebanon. AlAtrash won several battles against the French notably the Battle of alKafr on 21 July 1925 the Battle of alMazraa on 23 August 1925 and the battles of Salkhad alMusayfirah and Suwayda. France sent thousands of troops from Morocco and Senegal leading the French to regain many cities although resistance lasted until the spring of 1927. The French sentenced Sultan alAtrash to death but he had escaped with the rebels to Transjordan and was eventually pardoned. He returned to Syria in 1937 after the signing of the SyrianFrench Treaty. Syrian rebels in Ghouta during the Great Syrian Revolt against French colonial rule in the 19
20 s Syria and France negotiated a treaty of independence in September 1936 and Hashim alAtassi was the first president to be elected under the first incarnation of the modern republic of Syria. However the treaty never came into force because the French Legislature refused to ratify it. With the fall of France in 1940 during World War II Syria came under the control of Vichy France until the British and Free French occupied the country in the SyriaLebanon campaign in July 1941. Continuing pressure from Syrian nationalists and the British forced the French to evacuate their troops in April 1946 leaving the country in the hands of a republican government that had been formed during the mandate.85 Independent Syrian Republic Main articles Syrian Republic 194663 United Arab Republic and 1963 Syrian coup dtat Upheaval dominated Syrian politics from independence through the late 19
60 s. In May 1948 Syrian forces invaded Palestine together with other Arab states and immediately attacked Jewish settlements.86 Their president Shukri alQuwwatli instructed his troops in the front to destroy the Zionists.8788 The Invasion purpose was to prevent the establishment of the State of Israel.89 Toward this end the Syrian government engaged in an active process of recruiting former Nazis including several former members of the Schutzstaffel to build up their armed forces and military intelligence capabilities.90 Defeat in this war was one of several trigger factors for the March 1949 Syrian coup dtat by Col. Husni alZaim described as the first military overthrow of the Arab World89 since the start of the Second World War. This was soon followed by another overthrow by Col. Sami alHinnawi who was himself quickly deposed by Col. Adib Shishakli all within the same year.89 Shishakli eventually abolished multipartyism altogether but was himself overthrown in a 1954 coup and the parliamentary system was restored.89 However by this time power was increasingly concentrated in the military and security establishment.89 The weakness of Parliamentary institutions and the mismanagement of the economy led to unrest and the influence of Nasserism and other ideologies. There was fertile ground for various Arab nationalist Syrian nationalist and socialist movements which represented disaffected elements of society. Notably included were religious minorities who demanded radical reform.89 In November 1956 as a direct result of the Suez Crisis91 Syria signed a pact with the Soviet Union. This gave a foothold for Communist influence within the government in exchange for military equipment.89 Turkey then became worried about this increase in the strength of Syrian military technology as it seemed feasible that Syria might attempt to retake skenderun. Only heated debates in the United Nations lessened the threat of war.92 Aleppo in 1961 On 1 February 1958 Syrian President Shukri alQuwatli and Egypts Nasser announced the merging of Egypt and Syria creating the United Arab Republic and all Syrian political parties as well as the communists therein ceased overt activities.85 Meanwhile a group of Syrian Baathist officers alarmed by the partys poor position and the increasing fragility of the union decided to form a secret Military Committee its initial members were LieutenantColonel Muhammad Umran Major Salah Jadid and Captain Hafiz alAssad. Syria seceded from the union with Egypt on 28 September 1961 after a coup. Baathist Syria Quneitra village largely destroyed before the Israeli withdrawal in June 1974. The ensuing instability following the 1961 coup culminated in the 8 March 1963 Baathist coup. The takeover was engineered by members of the Arab Socialist Baath Party led by Michel Aflaq and Salah alDin alBitar. The new Syrian cabinet was dominated by Baath members.8589 Since the 1963 seizure of power by its Military Committee the Baath party has ruled Syria as totalitarian state. Baathists took control over countrys politics education culture religion and surveilled all aspects of civil society through its powerful Mukhabarat secret police. Syrian Arab Armed forces and secret police were integrated with the Baath party apparatus after the purging of traditional civilian and military elites by the new regime.93 Baathist military officers celebrated overthrowal of democratically elected Syrian President Nazim alQudsi in 1963. The event marked a radical break in modern Syrian history after which Baath party monopolised power in the country to establish a oneparty state and shaped a new sociopolitical order by enforcing its state ideology.94 On 23 February 1966 the neoBaathist Military Committee carried out an intraparty rebellion against the Baathist Old Guard Aflaq and Bitar imprisoned President Amin alHafiz and designated a regionalist civilian Baath government on 1 March.89 Although Nureddin alAtassi became the formal head of state Salah Jadid was Syrias effective ruler from 1966 until November 197095 when he was deposed by Hafiz alAssad who at the time was Minister of Defense.96 The coup led to the schism within the original panArab Baath Party one Iraqiled baath movement ruled Iraq from 1968 to 2003 and one Syrianled baath movement was established. In the first half of 1967 a lowkey state of war existed between Syria and Israel. Conflict over Israeli cultivation of land in the Demilitarized Zone led to 7 April prewar aerial clashes between Israel and Syria.97 When the SixDay War broke out between Egypt and Israel Syria joined the war and attacked Israel as well. In the final days of the war Israel turned its attention to Syria capturing twothirds of the Golan Heights in under 48 hours.98 The defeat caused a split between Jadid and Assad over what steps to take next.99 Baathist Syria under Assad Disagreement developed between Jadid who controlled the party apparatus and Assad who controlled the military. The 1970 retreat of Syrian forces sent to aid the PLO during the Black September also known as the Jordan Civil War of 1970 hostilities with Jordan reflected this disagreement.100 Hafez alAssad president of Syria from 1970 to 2000 The power struggle culminated in the November 1970 Syrian Corrective movement a bloodless military coup that installed Hafiz alAssad as the strongman of the government.96 General Hafiz alAssad transformed a Baathist party state into a totalitarian dictatorship marked by his pervasive grip on the party armed forces secret police media education sector religious and cultural spheres and all aspects of civil society. A cult of personality revolving around Hafiz and his family became a core tenet of Baathist ideology101 which espoused that Assad dynasty was destined to rule perennially.102 On 6 October 1973 Syria and Egypt initiated the Yom Kippur War against Israel. The Israel Defense Forces reversed the initial Syrian gains and pushed deeper into Syrian territory.103 In the late 19
70 s an Islamist uprising by the Muslim Brotherhood was aimed against the government. Islamists attacked civilians and offduty military personnel leading security forces to also kill civilians in retaliatory strikes. The uprising had reached its climax in the 1982 Hama massacre104 when some 10000  40000 people were killed by regular Syrian Army troops.105106 Syrian military invaded Lebanon after orders from Hafiz alAssad on 31 May 1976. In a major shift in relations with both other Arab states and the Western world Syria participated in the USled Gulf War against Saddam Hussein. Syria participated in the multilateral Madrid Conference of 1991 and during the 19
90 s engaged in negotiations with Israel. These negotiations failed and there have been no further direct SyrianIsraeli talks since President Hafiz alAssads meeting with then President Bill Clinton in Geneva in March 20
00.1 07 Hafiz alAssad died on 10 June 2000. His son Bashar alAssad was elected president in an election in which he ran unopposed.85 His election saw the birth of the Damascus Spring and hopes of reform but by autumn 2001 the authorities had suppressed the movement imprisoning some of its leading intellectuals.108 Instead reforms have been limited to some market reforms.101109110 On 5 October 2003 Israel bombed a site near Damascus claiming it was a terrorist training facility for members of Islamic Jihad.111 In March 2004 Syrian Kurds and Arabs clashed in the northeastern city of alQamishli. Signs of rioting were seen in the cities of Qamishli and Hasakeh.112 In 2005 Syria ended its military presence in Lebanon.113 Killing of Rafic Hariri in 2005 led to international condemnation and triggered a popular Intifada in Lebanon which forced Assad regime to end its 
29 year old of military occupation in Lebanon.114 On 6 September 2007 foreign jet fighters suspected as Israeli reportedly carried out Operation Orchard against a suspected nuclear reactor under construction by North Korean technicians.115 Current political situation Syrian Civil War Main article Syrian Civil War Syrian protesters gather in Hama during the outbreak of revolution chanting  Ashshab yurid isqat annizam Arabic     lit.the people want to bring down the regime. The ongoing Syrian Civil War was inspired by the Arab Spring revolutions. It began in 2011 as a chain of peaceful protests which was suppressed through a deadly crackdown by the Syrian security apparatus.116 In July 2011 Army defectors declared the formation of the Free Syrian Army and began forming fighting units. The opposition is dominated by Sunni Muslims whereas the leading government figures are generally associated with Alawites.117 The war also involves rebel groups IS and alNusra and various foreign countries leading to claims of a proxy war in Syria.118 According to various sources including the United Nations up to 100000 people had been killed by June 2013119120121 including 11000 children.122 To escape the violence 
4.9  million123 Syrian refugees have fled to neighboring countries of Jordan124 Iraq125 Lebanon and Turkey.126127 An estimated 450000 Syrian Christians have fled their homes.1
28 needs update By October 2017 an estimated 400000 people had been killed in the war according to the UN.129 Military situation in the Syrian Civil War as of January 2024. Controlled by Syrian Arab Republic Controlled by Syrian Interim Government SNA and Turkish Armed Forces Controlled by Syrian Salvation Government HTS Controlled by Autonomous Administration of North and East Syria SDF Controlled by Revolutionary Commando Army and United States Armed Forces Controlled by the Islamic State IS For a more detailed interactive map see TemplateSyrian Civil War detailed map. In September 2022 a new UN report stated that the Syrian Civil War was in danger of flaring up again. The UN also said it had been totally unable to deliver any supplies during the first half of 20
22.1 30 As of 2022 the main external military threat and conflict are firstly an ongoing conflict with ISIS and secondly ongoing concerns of possible invasion of the northeast regions of Syria by Turkish forces in order to strike Kurdish groups in general and Rojava in particular.131132133 An official report by the Rojava government noted Turkeybacked militias as the main threat to the region of Rojava and its government.134 As of 2023 Turkey was continuing its support for various militias within Syria which periodically attempted some operations against Kurdish groups consisting mostly of the YPGYPJ.135136137 One stated goal was to create 
30 kilometer 
18.6 mile wide safe zones along Turkeys border with Syria according to a statement by Turkish President Erdoan.138 The operations were generally aimed at the Tal Rifaat and Manbij regions west of the Euphrates and other areas further east. President Erdoan openly stated his support for the operations in talks with Moscow in mid20
22.1 39 In 2022 the leader of the Syrian Democratic Forces SDF Mazloum Abdi said that Kurdish forces were willing to work with Syrian government forces to defend against Turkey saying Damascus should use its air defense systems against Turkish planes. Abdi said that Kurdish groups would be able to cooperate with the Syrian government and still retain their autonomy.140141142143144 In July 2022 the SDF and the official Syrian military forged active plans to coordinate actively together to create defense plans to guard against invasion by Turkey.145 The SDF said that they felt that the main threat to Kurdish groups was an invasion by Turkey.146 As of 2023 active fighting in the conflict between the Syrian government and rebel groups had mostly subsided but there were occasional flareups in Northwestern Syria.147148 In early 2023 reports indicated that the forces of ISIS in Syria had mostly been defeated with only a few cells remaining in various remote locations.149150151 On 10 June 2020 hundreds of protesters returned to the streets of Sweida for the fourth consecutive day rallying against the collapse of the countrys economy as the Syrian pound plummeted to 3000 to the dollar within the previous week.152 Prime Minister Imad Khamis was dismissed by President Bashar alAssad amid antigovernment protests over deteriorating economic conditions.153 The new lows for the Syrian currency and the dramatic increase in sanctions began to appear to raise new concerns about the survival of the Assad government.154155156 Analysts noted that a resolution to the current banking crisis in Lebanon might be crucial to restoring stability in Syria.157 Some analysts began to raise concerns that Assad might be on the verge of losing power but that any such collapse in the regime might cause conditions to worsen as the result might be mass chaos rather than an improvement in political or economic conditions.158159160 Russia continued to expand its influence and military role in the areas of Syria where the main military conflict was occurring.161 Analysts noted that the upcoming implementation of new heavy sanctions under the US Caesar Act could devastate the Syrian economy ruin any chances of recovery destroy regional stability and do nothing but destabilize the entire region.162 The first new sanctions took effect on 17 June. There will be additional sanctions implemented in August in three different groups. There are increasing reports that food is becoming difficult to find the countrys economy is under severe pressure and the whole regime could collapse due to the sanctions.163 As of early 2022 Syria was still facing a major economic crisis due to sanctions and other economic pressures. there was some doubt of the Syrian governments ability to pay for subsisides for the population and for basic services and programs.164165166 The UN reported there were massive problems looming for Syrias ability to feed its population in the near future.167 In one possibly positive sign for the wellbeing of Syrias population several Arab countries began an effort to normalize relations with Syria and to conclude a deal to provide energy supplies to Syria. This effort was led by Jordan and included several other Arab countries.168 Geography Main article Geography of Syria Syria is the twelfth most water stressed country in the world. Syria lies between latitudes 32 and 38 N and longitudes 35 and 43 E. The climate varies from the humid Mediterranean coast through a semiarid steppe zone to arid desert in the east. The country consists mostly of arid plateau although the northwest part bordering the Mediterranean is fairly green. AlJazira in the northeast and Hawran in the south are important agricultural areas. The Euphrates Syrias most important river crosses the country in the east. Syria is one of the fifteen states that comprise the socalled cradle of civilization.169 Its land straddles the northwest of the Arabian plate.170 Petroleum in commercial quantities was first discovered in the northeast in 1956. The most important oil fields are those of alSuwaydiyah Karatchok Rmelan near alHasakah as well as alOmar and alTaym fields near Dayr azZawr. The fields are a natural extension of the Iraqi fields of Mosul and Kirkuk. Petroleum became Syrias leading natural resource and chief export after 1974. Natural gas was discovered at the field of Jbessa in 19
40.8 5 Biodiversity Main article Wildlife of Syria See also Environmental issues in Syria Syria contains four terrestrial ecoregions Syrian xeric grasslands and shrublands Eastern Mediterranean conifersclerophyllousbroadleaf forests Southern Anatolian montane conifer and deciduous forests and Mesopotamian shrub desert.171 The country had a 2019 Forest Landscape Integrity Index mean score of 
3.6 410 ranking it 1
44 th globally out of 172 countries.172 Government and politics Main article Politics of Syria See also Elections in Syria and Syrian civil war Bashar alAssad President Hussein Arnous Prime Minister Syria is a presidential state173 that nominally permits the candidacy of individuals who do not form part of the Baathcontrolled National Progressive Front.174175 Despite this Syria remains a oneparty state with an extensive secret police apparatus that curtails any independent political activity.176177 The new constitution introduced singlehandedly by the Assad regime without participation of the Syrian opposition has bolstered its authoritarian character by bestowing extraordinary powers on the Presidency and a Baathist political committee continues to be responsible for authorization of political parties.178 The ruling Arab Socialist Baath Party governs Syria as a totalitarian police state179 through its control of the Syrian military and security apparatus.g 
50 th edition of Freedom in the World the annual report published by Freedom House in 2023 designates Syria as Worst of the Worst among the Not Free countries and gives it the lowest score 1100 alongside South Sudan.180181 The President is Head of State and the Prime Minister is Head of Government.182 The legislature the Peoples Council is the body responsible for passing laws approving government appropriations and debating policy.183 In the event of a vote of no confidence by a simple majority the Prime Minister is required to tender the resignation of their government to the President.184 The executive branch consists of the president two vice presidents the prime minister and the Council of Ministers cabinet. The constitution requires the president to be a Muslim185 but does not make Islam the state religion. On 31 January 1973 Hafiz alAssad implemented a new constitution which led to a national crisis. Unlike previous constitutions this one did not require that the President of Syria be a Muslim leading to fierce demonstrations in Hama Homs and Aleppo organized by the Muslim Brotherhood and the traditional ulama. They labelled Assad the enemy of Allah and called for a jihad against his rule.186 The government survived a series of armed revolts led mostly by Islamists of the Muslim Brotherhood between 1976 and 1982 through a series of repressions and massacres. The constitution gives the president the right to appoint ministers to declare war and state of emergency to issue laws which except in the case of emergency require ratification by the Peoples Council to declare amnesty to amend the constitution and to appoint civil servants and military personnel.187 According to the 2012 constitution the president is elected by Syrian citizens in a direct election. Syrias legislative branch is the unicameral Peoples Council. Under the previous constitution Syria did not hold multiparty elections for the legislature187 with twothirds of the seats automatically allocated to the ruling coalition.188 On 7 May 2012 Syria held its first elections in which parties outside the ruling coalition could take part. Seven new political parties took part in the elections of which Popular Front for Change and Liberation was the largest opposition party. The antigovernment Syrian opposition coalition however chose not to field candidates and called on their supporters to boycott the elections. The Peoples Council primarily serves as an institution to validate Syrias oneparty system and reaffirm the legislative proceedings of the Arab Socialist Baath party.189 As of 2008 the President is the Regional Secretary of the Baath party in Syria and leader of the National Progressive Front governing coalition. Ethnic minorites like Kurds have no cultural or linguistic rights and activities of Kurdish political parties are banned.190 There is no independent judiciary in Syria since all judges and prosecutors are required to be Baathist appointees.191 Syrias judicial branches include the Supreme Constitutional Court the High Judicial Council the Court of Cassation and the State Security Courts. Islamic jurisprudence is a main source of legislation and Syrias judicial system has elements of Ottoman French and Islamic laws. Syria has three levels of courts courts of first instance courts of appeals and the constitutional court the highest tribunal. Religious courts handle questions of personal and family law.187 The Supreme State Security Court SSSC was abolished by President Bashar alAssad by legislative decree No. 53 on 21 April 20
11.1 92 The Personal Status Law 59 of 1953 amended by Law 34 of 1975 is essentially a codified sharia.193 Article 32 of the 1973 constitution declares Islamic jurisprudence a main source of legislation. The Code of Personal Status is applied to Muslims by sharia courts.194 As a result of the ongoing civil war various alternative governments were formed including the Syrian Interim Government the Democratic Union Party and localized regions governed by sharia law. Representatives of the Syrian Interim government were invited to take up Syrias seat at the Arab League on 28 March 2013 and195 was recognised as the sole representative of the Syrian people by several nations including the United States United Kingdom and France.196197198 Syrias elections are conducted through a sham process characterised by widescale rigging repetitive voting and absence of voter registration and verification systems.199200201 Parliamentary elections were held on 13 April 2016 in the governmentcontrolled areas of Syria for all 250 seats of Syrias unicameral legislature the Majlis alShaab or the Peoples Council of Syria.202 Even before results had been announced several nations including Germany the United States and the United Kingdom have declared their refusal to accept the results largely citing it not representing the will of the Syrian people.203 However representatives of the Russian Federation have voiced their support of this elections results. Various independent observers and international organizations have denounced the Assad regimes electoral conduct as a scam with the United Nations condemning it as illegitimate elections with no mandate.204205206207 Electoral Integrity Projects 2022 Global report designates Syrian elections as a facade with the worst electoral integrity in the world alongside Comoros and Central African Republic.208209 Three alternative governments formed during the Syrian Civil War the Syrian Interim Government formed in 2013 Rojava formed in 2016 and the Syrian Salvation Government formed in 2017 control northern of the country and operate independently of the Syrian Arab Republic. Administrative divisions Main articles Governorates of Syria and Districts of Syria Syria is divided into 14 governorates which are subdivided into 61 districts which are further divided into subdistricts. The Democratic Federation of Northern Syria while de facto autonomous is not recognized by the country as such. No. Governorate Capital Governorates of Syria 1 Latakia Latakia 2 Idlib Idlib 3 Aleppo Aleppo 4 Raqqa Raqqa 5 AlHasakah AlHasakah 6 Tartus Tartus 7 Hama Hama 8 Deir ezZor Deir ezZor 9 Homs Homs 10 Damascus Damascus 11 Rif Dimashq Douma 12 Quneitra Quneitra 13 Daraa Daraa 14 AlSuwayda AlSuwayda Autonomous Administration of North and East Syria The Autonomous Administration of North and East Syria AANES also known as Rojavah is a de facto autonomous region in northeastern Syria.213214 It consists of selfgoverning subregions in the areas of Afrin Jazira Euphrates Raqqa Tabqa Manbij and Deir EzZor.215216 The region gained its de facto autonomy in 2012 in the context of the ongoing Rojava conflict and the wider Syrian civil war in which its official military force the Syrian Democratic Forces SDF has taken part.217218 While entertaining some foreign relations the region is not officially recognized as autonomous by the government of Syria or any state219 though it has been recognized by the regional Catalan Parliament.220221 The AANES has widespread support for its universal democratic sustainable autonomous pluralist equal and feminist policies in dialogues with other parties and organizations.222223224225 Northeastern Syria is polyethnic and home to sizeable ethnic Kurdish Arab and Assyrian populations with smaller communities of ethnic Turkmen Armenians Circassians226 and Yazidis.227228229 The supporters of the regions administration state that it is an officially secular polity230231 with direct democratic ambitions based on an anarchistic feminist and libertarian socialist ideology promoting decentralization gender equality232233 environmental sustainability social ecology and pluralistic tolerance for religious cultural and political diversity and that these values are mirrored in its constitution society and politics stating it to be a model for a federalized Syria as a whole rather than outright independence.234235236237 The regions administration has also been accused by some partisan and nonpartisan sources of authoritarianism support of the Syrian government238 Kurdification and displacement.citation needed However despite this the AANES has been the most democratic system in Syria with direct open elections universal equality respecting human rights within the region as well as defense of minority and religious rights within Syria.239240241222242243244 On 13 October 2019 the SDF announced that it had reached an agreement with the Syrian Army which allowed the latter to enter the SDFheld cities of Manbij and Kobani in order to dissuade a Turkish attack on those cities as part of the crossborder offensive by Turkish and Turkishbacked Syrian rebels.245 The Syrian Army also deployed in the north of Syria together with the SDF along the SyrianTurkish border and entered into several SDFheld cities such as Ayn Issa and Tell Tamer.246247 Following the creation of the Second Northern Syria Buffer Zone the SDF stated that it was ready to work cooperatively with the Syrian Army if a political settlement between the Syrian government and the SDF was achieved.248 Foreign relations Main article Foreign relations of Syria Diplomatic missions of Syria Ensuring national security increasing influence among its Arab neighbors and securing the return of the Golan Heights have been the primary goals of Syrias foreign policy. At many points in its history Syria has seen virulent tension with its geographically cultural neighbors such as Turkey Israel Iraq and Lebanon. Syria enjoyed an improvement in relations with several of the states in its region in the 
21 st century prior to the Arab Spring and the Syrian Civil War. Since the ongoing civil war of 2011 and associated killings and human rights abuses Syria has been increasingly isolated from the countries in the region and the wider international community. Diplomatic relations have been severed with several countries including Britain Canada France Italy Germany Tunisia Egypt Libya the United States Belgium Spain and the Arab states of the Persian Gulf.249 Map of world and Syria red with military involvement. Countries that support the Syrian government Countries that support the Syrian rebels From the Arab league Syria continues to maintain diplomatic relations with Algeria Egypt Iraq Lebanon Sudan and Yemen. Syrias violence against civilians has also seen it suspended from the Arab League and the Organisation of Islamic Cooperation in 20
12.2 50 Syria also quit the Union for the Mediterranean.251 After 11 years the Arab League readmitted Syria.252 Syria continues to foster good relations with its traditional allies Iran and Russia who are among the few countries which have supported the Syrian government in its conflict with the Syrian opposition. Syria is included in the European Unions European Neighbourhood Policy ENP which aims at bringing the EU and its neighbors closer. International disputes See also Turkish occupation of northern Syria and Israelioccupied territories In 1939 while Syria was still a French mandate the French allowed a plebiscite regarding the Sanjak of Alexandretta joining to Turkey as part of a treaty of friendship in World War II. In order to facilitate this a faulty election was done in which ethnic Turks who were originally from the Sanjak but lived in Adana and other areas near the border in Turkey came to vote in the elections shifting the election in favor of secession. Through this the Hatay Province of Turkey was formed. The move by the French was very controversial in Syria and only five years later Syria became independent.253 Despite the Turkish annexation of the Sanjak of Alexandretta the Syrian government has refused to recognize Turkish sovereignty over the region since Independence except for a short period during the year of 19
49.2 54 The Syrian Golan Heights occupied by Israel since the SixDay War The western twothirds of Syrias Golan Heights region are since 1967 occupied by Israel and were in 1981 effectively annexed by Israel255256 whereas the eastern third is controlled by Syria with the UNDOF maintaining a buffer zone in between to implement the ceasefire of the Purple Line. Israels 1981 Golan annexation law is not recognized in international law. The UN Security Council condemned it in Resolution 497 1981 as null and void and without international legal effect. Since then General Assembly resolutions on The Occupied Syrian Golan reaffirm the illegality of Israeli occupation and annexation.257 The Syrian government continues to demand the return of this territory.258 The only remaining land Syria has in the Golan is a strip of territory which contains the abandoned city of Quneitra the governorates de facto capital Madinat alBaath and many small villages mostly populated by Circassians such as Beer Ajam and Hader.dubious  discuss In March 2019 U.S. President Donald Trump announced that the United States will recognize Israels annexation of the Golan Heights.259 In early 1976 Syria entered Lebanon beginning their twentynineyear military presence. Syria entered on the invitation of Suleiman Franjieh the Maronite Christian president at the time to help aid the Lebanese Christian militias against the Palestinian militias.260261 Over the following 15 years of civil war Syria fought for control over Lebanon. The Syrian military remained in Lebanon until 26 April 2005 in response to domestic and international pressure after the assassination of former Lebanese Prime Minister Rafik Hariri.262 Another disputed territory is the Shebaa farms located in the intersection of the LebaneseSyrian border and the Israeli occupied Golan Heights. The farms which are 11 km long and about 3 kilometers wide were occupied by Israel in 1981 along with rest of the Golan Heights.263 Yet following Syrian army advances the Israeli occupation ended and Syria became the de facto ruling power over the farms. Yet after Israeli withdrawal from Lebanon in 2000 Hezbollah claimed that the withdrawal was not complete because Shebaa was on Lebanese  not Syrian  territory.264 After studying 81 different maps the United Nations concluded that there is no evidence of the abandoned farmlands being Lebanese.265 Nevertheless Lebanon has continued to claim ownership of the territory. Military Main article Syrian Armed Forces A Syrian Army soldier manning a checkpoint outside of Damascus shortly after the outbreak of the Syrian Civil War 2012 The President of Syria is commander in chief of the Syrian Armed Forces comprising some 400000 troops upon mobilization. The military is a conscripted force males serve in the military upon reaching the age of 18.citation needed The obligatory military service period is being decreased over time in 2005 from two and a half years to two years in 2008 to 21 months and in 2011 to year and a half.266 About 20000 Syrian soldiers were deployed in Lebanon until 27 April 2005 when the last of Syrias troops left the country after three decades.citation needed The breakup of the Soviet Unionlong the principal source of training material and credit for the Syrian forcesmay have slowed Syrias ability to acquire modern military equipment. It has an arsenal of surfacetosurface missiles. In the early 19
90 s ScudC missiles with a 5
00 kilometre 3
10 mile range were procured from North Korea and ScudD with a range of up to 700 kilometres 430 miles is allegedly being developed by Syria with the help of North Korea and Iran according to Zisser.267 Syria received significant financial aid from Arab states of the Persian Gulf as a result of its participation in the Persian Gulf War with a sizable portion of these funds earmarked for military spending. Human rights Main articles Human rights in Syria and LGBT rights in Syria Wounded civilians arrive at a hospital in Aleppo October 2012 The situation for human rights in Syria has long been a significant concern among independent organizations such as Human Rights Watch who in 2010 referred to the countrys record as among the worst in the world.268 The 2011 Freedom House report269 ranked Syria Not Free in its annual Freedom in the World survey.270 The authorities are accused of arresting democracy and human rights activists censoring websites detaining bloggers and imposing travel bans. Arbitrary detention torture and disappearances are widespread.271272273 Although Syrias constitution guarantees gender equality critics say that personal statutes laws and the penal code discriminate against women and girls. Moreover it also grants leniency for socalled Honour killing.273 As of 9 November 2011 during the uprising against President Bashar alAssad the United Nations reported that of the over 3500 total deaths over 250 deaths were children as young as two years old and that boys as young as 11 years old have been gangraped by security services officers.274275 People opposing President Assads rule claim that more than 200 mostly civilians were massacred and about 300 injured in Hama in shelling by the Government forces on 12 July 20
12.2 76 In August 2013 the government was suspected of using chemical weapons against its civilians. US Secretary of State John Kerry said it was undeniable that chemical weapons had been used in the country and that President Bashar alAssads forces had committed a moral obscenity against his own people. Make no mistake Kerry said. President Obama believes there must be accountability for those who would use the worlds most heinous weapon against the worlds most vulnerable people. Nothing today is more serious and nothing is receiving more serious scrutiny.277 The Emergency Law effectively suspending most constitutional protections was in effect from 1963 until 21 April 20
11.1 92 It was justified by the government in the light of the continuing war with Israel over the Golan Heights. In August 2014 UN Human Rights chief Navi Pillay criticized the international community over its paralysis in dealing with the more than 
3 yearold civil war gripping the country which by 30 April 2014 had resulted in 191369 deaths with war crimes according to Pillay being committed with total impunity on all sides in the conflict. Minority Alawites and Christians are being increasingly targeted by Islamists and other groups fighting in the Syrian civil war.278279280281 Three years later in April 2017 the U.S. Navy carried out a missile attack against a Syrian air base282 which had allegedly been used to conduct a chemical weapons attack on Syrian civilians according to the US government.283 In November 2021 the US Central Command called a 2019 airstrike that killed civilians in Syria legitimate. The acknowledgement came after a New York Times investigation said the military had concealed the death of dozens of noncombatants.284 Agrarian reform Agrarian reform measures were introduced into Syria which consisted of three interrelated programs Legislation regulation the relationship between agriculture laborers and landowners legislation governing the ownership and use of private and state domain land and directing the economic organization of peasants and measures reorganizing agricultural production under state control.285 Despite high levels of inequality in land ownership these reforms allowed for progress in redistribution of land from 1958 to 1961 than any other reforms in Syrias history since independence. The first law passed Law 134 passed 4 September 1958 in response to concern about peasant mobilization and expanding peasants rights.286 This was designed to strengthen the position of sharecroppers and agricultural laborers in relation to land owners.286 This law led to the creation of the Ministry of Labor and Social Affairs which announced the implementation of new laws that would allow the regulation of working condition especially for women and adolescents set hours of work and introduce the principle of minimum wage for paid laborers and an equitable division of harvest for sharecroppers.287 Furthermore it obligated landlords to honor both written and oral contracts established collective bargaining contained provisions for workers compensation health housing and employment services.286 Law 134 was not designed strictly to protect workers. It also acknowledged the rights of landlords to form their own syndicates.286 Economy Main articles Economy of Syria and Industry in Syria See also Tourism in Syria Historical development of real GDP per capita in Syria since 1820 Bank AlSharq and the Blue Tower Hotel in Damascus As of 20
15 update the Syrian economy relies upon inherently unreliable revenue sources such as dwindling customs and income taxes which are heavily bolstered by lines of credit from Iran.288 Iran is believed to spend between 6 billion and US20 billion a year on Syria during the Syrian Civil War.289 The Syrian economy has contracted 60 and the Syrian pound has lost 80 of its value with the economy becoming part stateowned and part war economy.290 At the outset of the ongoing Syrian Civil War Syria was classified by the World Bank as a lower middle income country.291 In 2010 Syria remained dependent on the oil and agriculture sectors.292 The oil sector provided about 40 of export earnings.292 Proven offshore expeditions have indicated that large sums of oil exist on the Mediterranean Sea floor between Syria and Cyprus.293 The agriculture sector contributes to about 20 of GDP and 20 of employment. Oil reserves are expected to decrease in the coming years and Syria has already become a net oil importer.292 Since the civil war began the economy shrank by 35 and the Syrian pound has fallen to onesixth of its prewar value.294 The government increasingly relies on credit from Iran Russia and China.294 AlHamidiyah Souq in Damascus in 2010 The economy is highly regulated by the government which has increased subsidies and tightened trade controls to assuage protesters and protect foreign currency reserves.8 Longrun economic constraints include foreign trade barriers declining oil production high unemployment rising budget deficits and increasing pressure on water supplies caused by heavy use in agriculture rapid population growth industrial expansion and water pollution.8 The UNDP announced in 2005 that 30 of the Syrian population lives in poverty and 
11.4  live below the subsistence level.85 Syrias share in global exports has eroded gradually since 20
01.2 95 The real per capita GDP growth was just 
2.5  per year in the 20002008 period.295 Unemployment is high at above 10. Poverty rates have increased from 11 in 2004 to 
12.3  in 20
07.2 95 In 2007 Syrias main exports included fenethylline pills an illegal drug commonly known as captagon crude oil refined products raw cotton clothing fruits and grains. The bulk of Syrian imports are raw materials essential for industry vehicles agricultural equipment and heavy machinery. Earnings from oil exports as well as remittances from Syrian workers are the governments most important sources of foreign exchange.85 Political instability poses a significant threat to future economic development.296 Foreign investment is constrained by violence government restrictions economic sanctions and international isolation. Syrias economy also remains hobbled by state bureaucracy falling oil production rising budget deficits and inflation.296 Prior to the civil war in 2011 the government hoped to attract new investment in the tourism natural gas and service sectors to diversify its economy and reduce its dependence on oil and agriculture. The government began to institute economic reforms aimed at liberalizing most markets but those reforms were slow and ad hoc and have been completely reversed since the outbreak of conflict in 20
11.2 97 A cove in Latakia in 2014 As of 20
12 update because of the ongoing Syrian civil war the value of Syrias overall exports has been slashed by twothirds from the figure of US12 billion in 2010 to only US4 billion in 20
12.2 98 Syrias GDP declined by over 3 in 2011299 and is expected to further decline by 20 in 20
12.3 00 As of 20
12 update Syrias oil and tourism industries in particular have been devastated with US5 billion lost to the ongoing conflict of the civil war.298 Reconstruction needed because of the ongoing civil war will cost as much as US10 billion.298 Sanctions have sapped the governments finances. US and European Union bans on oil imports which went into effect in 2012 are estimated to cost Syria about 400 million a month.301 Revenues from tourism have dropped dramatically with hotel occupancy rates falling from 90 before the war to less than 15 in May 20
12.3 02 Around 40 of all employees in the tourism sector have lost their jobs since the beginning of the war.302 In May 2015 ISIS captured Syrias phosphate mines one of the Syrian governments last chief sources of income.303 The following month ISIS blew up a gas pipeline to Damascus that was used to generate heating and electricity in Damascus and Homs the name of its game for now is denial of key resources to the regime an analyst stated.304 In addition ISIS was closing in on Shaer gas field and three other facilities in the areaHayan Jihar and Eblawith the loss of these western gas fields having the potential to cause Iran to further subsidize the Syrian government.305 Aleppo soap is a popular product of Syria. Drug industry Syria is home to a burgeoning illegal drugs industry run by associates and relatives of the Syrian president Bashar alAssar.306 It mainly produces captagon an addictive amphetamine popular in the Arab world. As of 2021 the export of illegal drugs eclipsed the countrys legal exports leading the New York Times to call Syria the worlds newest narcostate.306 The drug exports allow the Syrian government to generate hard currency and bypass international sanctions.306307308 Captagon is Syrias primary export valued at a minimum of US
3.4  billion annually surpassing the countrys largest legal export olive oil which is valued at around US122 million dollars a year as per estimates.309 Petroleum industry Main article Petroleum industry in Syria Oil refinery in Homs Syrias petroleum industry has been subject to a sharp decline. In September 2014 ISIS was producing more oil than the government at 80000 bbld 13000 m
3 d compared to the governments 17000 bbld 2700 m
3 d with the Syrian Oil Ministry stating that by the end of 2014 oil production had plunged further to 9329 bbld 14
83.2  m
3 d ISIS has since captured a further oil field leading to a projected oil production of 6829 bbld 10
85.7  m
3 d.288 In the third year of the Syrian Civil War the deputy economy minister Salman Hayan stated that Syrias two main oil refineries were operating at less than 10 capacity.310 Historically the country produced heavygrade oil from fields located in the northeast since the late 19
60 s. In the early 19
80 s lightgrade lowsulphur oil was discovered near Deir ezZor in eastern Syria. Syrias rate of oil production has decreased dramatically from a peak close to 600000 barrels per day 95000 m
3 d bpd in 1995 down to less than 182500 bbld 29020 m
3 d in 20
12.3 11 Since 2012 the production has decreased even more reaching 32000 barrels per day 5100 m
3 d bpd in 2014. Official figures quantity the production in 2015 at 27000 barrels per day 4300 m
3 d but those figures have to be taken with precaution because it is difficult to estimate the oil that is currently produced in the rebel held areas. Prior to the uprising more than 90 of Syrian oil exports were to EU countries with the remainder going to Turkey.302 Oil and gas revenues constituted in 2012 around 20 of total GDP and 25 of total government revenue.302 Expressway M5 near AlRastan Transport Main article Transport in Syria Syria has four international airports Damascus Aleppo Lattakia and Kamishly which serve as hubs for Syrian Air and are also served by a variety of foreign carriers.312 The majority of Syrian cargo is carried by Syrian Railways the Syrian railway company which links up with Turkish State Railways the Turkish counterpart. For a relatively underdeveloped country Syrias railway infrastructure is well maintained with many express services and modern trains.313 The road network in Syria is 69873 kilometres 43417 miles long including 1103 kilometres 685 miles of expressways. The country also has 900 kilometres 560 miles of navigable but not economically significant waterways.8 Internet and telecommunications Telecommunications in Syria are overseen by the Ministry of Communications and Technology.314 In addition Syrian Telecom plays an integral role in the distribution of government internet access.315 The Syrian Electronic Army serves as a progovernment military faction in cyberspace and has been long considered an enemy of the hacktivist group Anonymous.316 Because of internet censorship laws 13000 internet activists were arrested between March 2011 and August 20
12.3 17 Water supply and sanitation Main article Water supply and sanitation in Syria Syria is a semiarid country with scarce water resources. The largest water consuming sector in Syria is agriculture. Domestic water use stands at only about 9 of total water use.318 A big challenge for Syria before the civil war was its high population growth in 2006 the growth rate was 
2.7 319 leading to rapidly increasing demand for urban and industrial water.320 Demographics Main articles Demographics of Syria and List of cities in Syria Further information Syrians Historical populations Year Pop.  p.a. 1960 4565000  1970 6305000 
3.2 8 1981 9046000 
3.3 4 1994 13782000 
3.2 9 2004 17921000 
2.6 6 2011 21124000 
2.3 8 2015 18734987 
2.9 6 2019 18528105 
0.2 8 2019 estimate321 Source Central Bureau of Statistics of the Syrian Arab Republic 2011322 Most people live in the Euphrates River valley and along the coastal plain a fertile strip between the coastal mountains and the desert. Overall population density in Syria before the Civil War was about 99 per square kilometre 258 per square mile.323 According to the World Refugee Survey 2008 published by the U.S. Committee for Refugees and Immigrants Syria hosted a population of refugees and asylum seekers numbering approximately 1852300. The vast majority of this population was from Iraq 1300000 but sizeable populations from Palestine 543400 and Somalia 5200 also lived in the country.324 In what the UN has described as the biggest humanitarian emergency of our era325 by 2014 about 
9.5  million Syrians half the population had been displaced since the outbreak of the Syrian Civil War in March 2011326 4 million were outside the country as refugees.327 By 2020 the UN estimated that over 
5.5  million Syrians were living as refugees in the region and 
6.1  million others were internally displaced.328 Largest cities v t e Largest cities or towns in Syria Syria Central Bureau of Statistics 2004 Census Rank Name Province Pop. Rank Name Province Pop. Aleppo Damascus 1 Aleppo Aleppo Governorate 2132100 11 Tartus Tartus Governorate 115769 Homs Latakia 2 Damascus Damascus 1552161 12 Jaramana Rif Dimashq Governorate 114363 3 Homs Homs Governorate 652609 13 Douma Syria Rif Dimashq Governorate 110893 4 Latakia Latakia Governorate 383786 14 Manbij Aleppo Governorate 99497 5 Hama Hama Governorate 312994 15 Idlib Idlib Governorate 98791 6 Raqqa Raqqa Governorate 220488 16 Daraa Daraa Governorate 97969 7 Deir ezZor Deir ezZor Governorate 211857 17 AlHajar alAswad Rif Dimashq Governorate 84948 8 Hasakah AlHasakah Governorate 188160 18 Darayya Rif Dimashq Governorate 78763 9 Qamishli AlHasakah Governorate 184231 19 Suwayda AsSuwayda Governorate 73641 10 Sayyidah Zaynab Rif Dimashq Governorate 136427 20 AlThawrah Raqqa Governorate 69425 Ethnic groups Main article Syrians Damascus traditional clothing Syrians are an overall indigenous Levantine people closely related to their immediate neighbors such as Lebanese Palestinians Jordanians and Jews.329330 Syria has a population of approximately 18500000 2019 estimate. Syrian Arabs together with some 600000 Palestinian not including the 6 million refugees outside the country. Arabs make up roughly 74 of the population.8 The indigenous Assyrians and Western Aramaicspeakers number around 400000 people331 with the Western Aramaicspeakers living mainly in the villages of Maloula Jubbadin and Bakha while the Assyrians mainly reside in the north and northeast Homs Aleppo Qamishli Hasakah. Many particularly the Assyrian group still retain several NeoAramaic dialects as spoken and written languages.332 The secondlargest ethnic group in Syria are the Kurds. They constitute about 9333 to 10334 of the population or approximately 2 million people including 40000 Yazidis334. Most Kurds reside in the northeastern corner of Syria and most speak the Kurmanji variant of the Kurdish language.333 The third largest ethnic group are the Turkishspeaking Syrian TurkmenTurkoman. There are no reliable estimates of their total population with estimates ranging from several hundred thousand to 
3.5  million.335336337 The fourth largest ethnic group are the Assyrians 34334 followed by the Circassians 
1.5 334 and the Armenians 1334 most of which are the descendants of refugees who arrived in Syria during the Armenian genocide. Syria holds the 
7 th largest Armenian population in the world. They are mainly gathered in Aleppo Qamishli Damascus and Kesab. The ethnoreligious composition of Syria There are also smaller ethnic minority groups such as the Albanians Bosnians Georgians Greeks Persians Pashtuns and Russians.334 However most of these ethnic minorities have become Arabized to some degree particularly those who practice the Muslim faith.334 The largest concentration of the Syrian diaspora outside the Arab world is in Brazil which has millions of people of Arab and other Near Eastern ancestries.338 Brazil is the first country in the Americas to offer humanitarian visas to Syrian refugees.339 The majority of Arab Argentines are from either Lebanese or Syrian background.340 Languages Main article Languages of Syria Arabic is the official language of the country.1 Several modern Arabic dialects are used in everyday life most notably Levantine in the west and Mesopotamian in the northeast. According to The Encyclopedia of Arabic Language and Linguistics in addition to Arabic the following languages are spoken in the country in order of the number of speakers Kurdish341 Turkish341 NeoAramaic four dialects341 Circassian341 Chechen341 Armenian341 and finally Greek.341 However none of these minority languages have official status.341 Aramaic was the lingua franca of the region before the advent of Arabic and is still spoken among Assyrians and Classical Syriac is still used as the liturgical language of various Syriac Christian denominations. Most remarkably Western NeoAramaic is still spoken in the village of Maloula as well as two neighboring villages 56 km 35 mi northeast of Damascus. English and French are widely spoken as second languages but English is more often used.342 Religion Main articles Religion in Syria Islam in Syria and Christianity in Syria Great Mosque of Aleppo Aleppo Sunni Muslims make up around 74 of Syrias population8 and Sunni Arabs account for 5960 of the population. Most Kurds 
8.5 343 and most Turkmens 3343 are Sunni and account for the difference between Sunnis and Sunni Arabs while 3 of Syrians are Shia Muslims particularly Ismailis and Twelvers but there are also Arabs Kurds and Turkmens 10 Alawites 10 Christians8 the majority are Antiochian Greek Orthodox the rest are Syriac Orthodox Greek Catholic and other Catholic Rites Armenian Orthodox Assyrian Church of the East Protestants and other denominations and 3 Druzes.8 Druze number around 500000 and concentrate mainly in the southern area of Jabal alDruze.344 President Bashar alAssads family is Alawite and Alawites dominate the government of Syria and hold key military positions.101345346 In May 2013 SOHR stated that out of 94000 killed during the Syrian Civil War at least 41000 were Alawites.347 Christians 
1.2  million a sizable number of whom are found among Syrias population of Palestinian and Iraqi refugees are divided into several sects Greek Orthodox make up 
45.7  of the Christian population the Syriac Orthodox make up 
22.4  the Armenian Orthodox make up 
10.9  the Catholics including Greek Catholic Syriac Catholic Armenian Catholic Maronite Chaldean Catholic and Latin make up 
16.2  Assyrian Church of the East and several smaller Christian denominations account for the remainder. Many Christian monasteries also exist. Many Christian Syrians belong to a high socioeconomic class.348 As per one estimate the count of Christians affiliated with established denominations in Syria has dropped from approximately 
2.5  million before the civil war to about 500000 in 20
23.3 49 Syria was once home to a substantial population of Jews with large communities in Damascus Aleppo and Qamishii. Due to a combination of persecution in Syria and opportunities elsewhere the Jews began to emigrate in the second half of the 
19 th century to Great Britain the United States and Israel. The process was completed with the establishment of the State of Israel in 1948. In 2021 there were no Jews left in Syria.350 Education Main article Education in Syria Faculty of Arts and Humanities in Aleppo University Education is free and compulsory from ages 6 to 12. Schooling consists of 6 years of primary education followed by a 
3 year general or vocational training period and a 
3 year academic or vocational program. The second 
3 year period of academic training is required for university admission. Total enrollment at postsecondary schools is over 150000. The literacy rate of Syrians aged 15 and older is 
90.7  for males and 
82.2  for females.351352 UIS adult literacy rate of Syria Since 1967 all schools colleges and universities have been under close government supervision by the Baath Party.353 There are 6 state universities in Syria354 and 15 private universities.355 The top two state universities are Damascus University 210000 students as of 2014356 and University of Aleppo.357 The top private universities in Syria are Syrian Private University Arab International University University of Kalamoon and International University for Science and Technology. There are also many higher institutes in Syria like the Higher Institute of Business Administration which offer undergraduate and graduate programs in business.358 According to the Webometrics Ranking of World Universities the topranking universities in the country are Damascus University 35
40 th worldwide the University of Aleppo 71
76 th and Tishreen University 79
68 th.359 Health Main article Health in Syria In 2010 spending on healthcare accounted for 
3.4  of the countrys GDP. In 2008 there were 
14.9  physicians and 
18.5  nurses per 10000 inhabitants.360 The life expectancy at birth was 
75.7  years in 2010 or 
74.2  years for males and 
77.3  years for females.361 Culture Main article Culture of Syria Dabke combines circle dance and line dancing and is widely performed at weddings and other joyous occasions. Syria is a traditional society with a long cultural history.362 Importance is placed on family religion education selfdiscipline and respect. Syrians taste for the traditional arts is expressed in dances such as the alSamah the Dabkeh in all their variations and the sword dance. Marriage ceremonies and the births of children are occasions for the lively demonstration of folk customs.363 Literature Main article literature of Syria Adunis The literature of Syria has contributed to Arabic literature and has a proud tradition of oral and written poetry. Syrian writers many of whom migrated to Egypt played a crucial role in the nahda or Arab literary and cultural revival of the 
19 th century. Prominent contemporary Syrian writers include among others Adonis Muhammad Maghout Haidar Haidar Ghada alSamman Nizar Qabbani and Zakariyya Tamer. Baath Party rule since the 1966 coup has brought about renewed censorship.364365 In this context the genre of the historical novel spearheaded by Nabil Sulayman Fawwaz Haddad Khyri alDhahabi and Nihad Siris is sometimes used as a means of expressing dissent critiquing the present through a depiction of the past. Syrian folk narrative as a subgenre of historical fiction is imbued with magical realism and is also used as a means of veiled criticism of the present. Salim Barakat a Syrian migr living in Sweden is one of the leading figures of the genre. Contemporary Syrian literature also encompasses science fiction and futuristic utopiae Nuhad Sharif Talib Umran which may also serve as media of dissent. Music Main article Music of Syria The Syrian music scene in particular that of Damascus has long been among the Arab worlds most important especially in the field of classical Arab music. Syria has produced several panArab stars including Asmahan Farid alAtrash and singer Lena Chamamyan. The city of Aleppo is known for its muwashshah a form of Andalous sung poetry popularized by Sabri Moudallal as well as for popular stars like Sabah Fakhri. Media Suzan Najm Aldeen  a popular Syrian actress in the Arab world Television was introduced to Syria and Egypt in 1960 when both were part of the United Arab Republic. It broadcast in black and white until 1976. Syrian soap operas have considerable market penetration throughout the eastern Arab world.366 Nearly all of Syrias media outlets are stateowned and the Baath Party controls nearly all newspapers.367 The authorities operate several intelligence agencies368 among them Shubat alMukhabarat alAskariyya employing many operatives.369 During the Syrian Civil War many of Syrias artists poets writers and activists have been incarcerated and some have been killed including famed cartoonist Akram Raslam.370 Cuisine Main article Syrian cuisine Fattoush a Syrian bread salad Syrian cuisine is rich and varied in its ingredients linked to the regions of Syria where a specific dish has originated. Syrian food mostly consists of Southern Mediterranean Greek and Southwest Asian dishes. Some Syrian dishes also evolved from Turkish and French cooking dishes like shish kebab stuffed zucchinicourgette and yabra stuffed grape leaves the word yabra deriving from the Turkish word yaprak meaning leaf. The main dishes that form Syrian cuisine are kibbeh hummus tabbouleh fattoush labneh shawarma mujaddara shanklish pastrma sujuk and baklava. Baklava is made of filo pastry filled with chopped nuts and soaked in honey. Syrians often serve selections of appetizers known as meze before the main course. Zaatar minced beef and cheese manakish are popular hors duvres. The Arabic flatbread khubz is always eaten together with meze. Drinks in Syria vary depending on the time of day and the occasion. Arabic coffee is the most wellknown hot drink usually prepared in the morning at breakfast or in the evening. It is usually served for guests or after food. Arak an alcoholic drink is a wellknown beverage served mostly on special occasions. Other Syrian beverages include ayran jallab white coffee and a locally manufactured beer called Al Shark.371 See also Asia portal Index of Syriarelated articles International recognition of the Syrian National Council References Notes  Arabic  romanized Sriy or  Sriya.  Arabic    romanized alJumhriyya alArabiyya asSriyya.  Sources 11 Alsharif Asma 16 August 2012. Organization of Islamic Cooperation suspends Syria. Reuters. Archived from the original on 22 September 2022. Islamic bloc suspends Syria membership over crisis. DW News. 16 August 2012. Archived from the original on 27 June 2018. Organisation of Islamic Cooperation suspends Syria. Ahram Online. 16 August 2012. Archived from the original on 1 July 2018. OIC Suspends Syria Over Crackdown. RFERL. 16 August 2012. Archived from the original on 8 February 2023.  Sources  Corruption Perceptions Index  2022. Transparency International. 2022. Archived from the original on 4 February 2023. Middle East corruption rankings Syria most corrupt UAE least Turkey slipped. AlMonitor. 31 January 2023. Archived from the original on 3 February 2023. Corruption in Syria. Worlddata.info. 2022. Archived from the original on 14 November 2022. Syria Yemen and Libya among lowest in the world for corruption perceptions. The New Arab. 31 January 2023. Archived from the original on 8 February 2023.  Sources1617181920212223  25262728  Sources describing Syria as a totalitarian state Khamis B. Gold Vaughn Sahar Paul Katherine 2013. 22. Propaganda in Egypt and Syrias Cyberwars Contexts Actors Tools and Tactics. In Auerbach Castronovo Jonathan Russ ed.. The Oxford Handbook of Propaganda Studies. Madison Avenue New York NY Oxford University Press. p. 422. ISBN 9780199764419.cite book CS1 maint multiple names authors list link Wieland Carsten 2018. 6 Deneutralizing Aid All Roads Lead to Damascus. Syria and the Neutrality Trap The Dilemmas of Delivering Humanitarian Aid Through Violent Regimes. 50 Bedford Square London WC
1 B 
3 DP UK I. B. Tauris. p. 68. ISBN 9780755641383.cite book CS1 maint location link Meininghaus Esther 2016. Introduction. Creating Consent in Bathist Syria Women and Welfare in a Totalitarian State. I. B. Tauris. pp. 133. ISBN 9781784531157. Sadiki Larbi Fares Obaida 2014. 12 The Arab Spring Comes to Syria Internal Mobilization for Democratic Change Militarization and Internationalization. Routledge Handbook of the Arab Spring Rethinking Democratization. Routledge. p. 147. ISBN 9780415523912.  The name Rojava The West was initially used by the regions PYDled government before its usage was dropped in 20
16.2 10211212 Since then the name is still used by locals and international observers. Citations  a b Constitution of the Syrian Arab Republic  2012 PDF. International Labour Organization. Retrieved 31 August 2020.  a b c Syria People and society. The World Factbook. CIA. 10 May 2022.  Largest Ethnic Groups In Syria. WorldAtlas. 7 June 2018. Retrieved 18 August 2022.  Syrian Arab Republic. Federal Foreign Office. 13 January 2023. Archived from the original on 25 March 2023. System of government Officially a socialist... democratic state presidential system ruled by the alAssad family with the security services occupying a powerful position Syria Government. CIA World Factbook. Archived from the original on 3 February 2021. Syria Government. Archived from the original on 27 January 2023. Syrian Arab Republic Constitution 2012. refworld. 26 February 2021. Archived from the original on 5 March 2019.  Khamis B. Gold Vaughn Sahar Paul Katherine 2013. 22. Propaganda in Egypt and Syrias Cyberwars Contexts Actors Tools and Tactics. In Auerbach Castronovo Jonathan Russ ed.. The Oxford Handbook of Propaganda Studies. 198 Madison Avenue New York NY 10016 Oxford University Press. p. 422. ISBN 9780199764419.cite book CS1 maint location link CS1 maint multiple names authors list link Wieland Carsten 2018. 6 Deneutralizing Aid All Roads Lead to Damascus. Syria and the Neutrality Trap The Dilemmas of Delivering Humanitarian Aid Through Violent Regimes. 50 Bedford Square London WC
1 B 
3 DP UK I. B. Tauris. p. 68. ISBN 9780755641383.cite book CS1 maint location link Ahmed Saladdin 2019. Totalitarian Space and the Destruction of Aura. State University of New York Press Albany Suny Press. pp. 144 149. ISBN 9781438472911. Hensman Rohini 2018. 7 The Syrian Uprising. Indefensible Democracy Counterrevolution and the Rhetoric of AntiImperialism. Chicago Illinois Haymarket Books. ISBN 9781608469123.  Syrian ministry of foreign affairs. Archived from the original on 11 May 2012.  Syria. The World Factbook 2024 ed.. Central Intelligence Agency. Retrieved 22 June 2023.  a b c d e f g h i j Syria. The World Factbook. Central Intelligence Agency. Retrieved 7 April 2021.  World Bank GINI index. World Bank. Retrieved 22 January 2013.  HUMAN DEVELOPMENT REPORT 202324 PDF. United Nations Development Programme. United Nations Development Programme. 13 March 2024. pp. 274277.  Regional group votes to suspend Syria rebels claim downing of jet. CNN. 14 August 2012. Retrieved 14 August 2012.  Country Dashboard. Global Peace Index. Fragile States Index. Retrieved 3 June 2023.  Global Peace Index. Vision of Humanity. Retrieved 14 October 2019.  Syria. Reporters Without Borders. 2023. Archived from the original on 8 May 2023.  Iran Syria rank lowest for press freedom globally. Middle East Monitor. 4 May 2023. Archived from the original on 4 May 2023.  Assad Iran Russia committed 91 of civilian killings in Syria. Middle East Monitor. 20 June 2022. Archived from the original on 4 January 2023.  Civilian Death Toll. SNHR. September 2022. Archived from the original on 5 March 2022.  91 percent of civilian deaths caused by Syrian regime and Russian forces rights group. The New Arab. 19 June 2022. Archived from the original on 5 January 2023.  2020 Country Reports on Human Rights Practices Syria. U.S Department of State. Archived from the original on 2 July 2022.  In Syrias Civilian Death Toll The Islamic State Group Or ISIS Is A Far Smaller Threat Than Bashar Assad. SOHR. 11 January 2015. Archived from the original on 6 April 2022.  Assads War on the Syrian People Continues. SOHR. 11 March 2021. Archived from the original on 13 March 2021.  Roth Kenneth 9 January 2017. Barack Obamas Shaky Legacy on Human Rights. Human Rights Watch. Archived from the original on 2 February 2021.  The Regional War in Syria Summary of Caabu event with Christopher Phillips. Council for ArabBritish Understanding.  UNHCR Syria Regional Refugee Response. United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees UNHCR. Archived from the original on 19 February 2018. Retrieved 9 August 2013.  Syria Unprecedented rise in poverty rate significant shortfall in humanitarian aid funding. Reliefweb. 18 October 2022. Archived from the original on 2 November 2022.  Every Day Counts Children of Syria cannot wait any longer. unicef. 2022. Archived from the original on 13 July 2022.  Hunger poverty and rising prices How one family in Syria bears the burden of 11 years of conflict. reliefweb. 15 March 2022. Archived from the original on 16 March 2022.  UN Chief says 90 of Syrians live below poverty line. 14 January 2022. Archived from the original on 3 December 2022.  Rollinger Robert 2006. The terms Assyria and Syria again. Journal of Near Eastern Studies. 65 4 284287. doi
10.1 086511103. S
2 CID 162760021.  Frye R. N. 1992. Assyria and Syria Synonyms. Journal of Near Eastern Studies. 51 4 281285. doi
10.1 086373570. S
2 CID 161323237.  Adam 781. Translation of the Nestorian Inscription. Stele to the Propagation in China of the Jingjiao of Daqin. Translated by Wylie Alexander.  Herodotus. The History of Herodotus Rawlinson.  Joseph John 2008. Assyria and Syria Synonyms PDF.  First proposed by Theodor Nldeke in 1881 cf. Harper Douglas November 2001. Syria. Online Etymology Dictionary. Retrieved 13 June 2007.  Rollinger Robert 1 October 2006. The Terms Assyria and Syria Again. Journal of Near Eastern Studies. 65 4 283287. doi
10.1 086511103. ISSN 00222968. S
2 CID 162760021.  Pliny March 1998. Book 5 Section 66. Natural History. 
77 AD. University of Chicago. ISBN 9788424919016.  Syria  Roman provincial organization. Britannica Online Encyclopedia. Retrieved 25 October 2008.  Pettinato Giovanni. The Archives of Ebla Gelb I. J. Thoughts about Ibla A Preliminary Evaluation in Monographic Journals of the Near East SyroMesopotamian Studies 11 May 1977 pp. 330.  William J. Hamblin 2006. Warfare in the Ancient Near East to 1600 BC Holy Warriors at the Dawn of History. Routledge. p. 239. ISBN 9781134520626.  Ian Shaw Robert Jameson 2008. A Dictionary of Archaeology. John Wiley  Sons. p. 211. ISBN 9780470751961.  Ross Burns 2009. Monuments of Syria A Guide. I.B.Tauris. p. 155. ISBN 9780857714893.  Paolo Matthiae Nicol Marchetti 31 May 2013. Ebla and its Landscape Early State Formation in the Ancient Near East. Left Coast Press. p. 35. ISBN 9781611322286.  Victor Harold Matthews Don C. Benjamin 1997. Old Testament Parallels Laws and Stories from the Ancient Near East. Paulist Press. p. 241. ISBN 9780809137312.  a b About the Ancient Area of Greater Syria. ThoughtCo. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Kenneth Anderson Kitchen 2003. On the Reliability of the Old Testament. Wm. B. Eerdmans Publishing. p. 285. ISBN 9780802849601.  Stephen C. Neff 2014. Justice among Nations. Harvard University Press. p. 14. ISBN 9780674726543.  The Aramaic Language and Its Classification PDF. Journal of Assyrian Academic Studies. 14 1. Archived from the original PDF on 9 September 2008. Retrieved 17 February 2008.  Trevor Bryce 2014. Ancient Syria A Three Thousand Year History. OUP Oxford. p. 16. ISBN 9780191002922.  Cyrus Herzl Gordon Gary Rendsburg Nathan H. Winter 1990. Eblaitica Essays on the Ebla Archives and Eblaite Language Volume 4. Eisenbrauns. p. 68. ISBN 9781575060606.  John F. Healey 1990. The Early Alphabet. University of California Press. p. 22. ISBN 9780520073098.  Neolithic Tell Ramad in the Damascus Basin of Syria. Archive. Archived from the original on 11 November 2006. Retrieved 25 January 2013.  a b Stephanie Dalley 2002. Mari and Karana Two Old Babylonian Cities. Gorgias Press. p. 44. ISBN 9781931956024.  Nadav Naaman 2005. Canaan in the Second Millennium B.C.E. Eisenbrauns. p. 285. ISBN 9781575061139.  Iorwerth Eiddon Stephen Edwards 1973. The Cambridge Ancient History. Cambridge University Press. p. 32. ISBN 9780521082303.  William J. Hamblin 2006. Warfare in the Ancient Near East to 1600 BC. Routledge. p. 259. ISBN 9781134520626.  Jack M. Sasson 1969. The Military Establishments at Mari. p. 23.  Relations between God and Man in the HurroHittite Song of Release Mary R. Bachvarova Journal of the American Oriental Society JanMar SAAD 2005  The foreigners of the fourth register with long hairstyles and calflength fringed robes are labeled Chiefs of Retjenu the ancient name tor the Syrian region. Like the Nubians they come with animals in this case horses an elephant and a bear they also offer weapons and vessels most likely filled with precious substance. in Hawass Zahi A. Vannini Sandro 2009. The lost tombs of Thebes life in paradise. Thames  Hudson. p. 120. ISBN 9780500051597.  Zakrzewski Sonia Shortland Andrew Rowland Joanne 2015. Science in the Study of Ancient Egypt. Routledge. p. 268. ISBN 9781317391951.  John Lange 2006. The Philosophy of Historiography. Open Road Integrated Media Incorporated. p. 475. ISBN 9781617561320.  Immanuel Velikovsky 2010. Ramses II and His Time. Paradigma. p. 23. ISBN 9781906833749.  Douglas Frayne 1981. Ugarit in Retrospect. Eisenbrauns. p. 232425. ISBN 9780931464072.  Georges Roux Ancient Iraq 
3 rd ed. Penguin Books London 1991 p.381  Rollinger Robert 2006. The terms Assyria and Syria again. Journal of Near Eastern Studies. 65 4 284287. doi
10.1 086511103. S
2 CID 162760021.  Hist. xviii. vii. 1  Charlotte Higgins 13 October 2009. When Syrians Algerians and Iraqis patrolled Hadrians Wall. The Guardian.  Palmyra Mirage in the Desert Joan Aruz 2018 page 78.  a b Cavendish Corporation Marshall 2006. World and Its Peoples. Marshall Cavendish. p. 183. ISBN 9780761475712.  a b Muir William 1861 The life of Mahomet Smith Elder  Co pp. 225226  Military Platoons and Missions between the Battle of Uhud and the Battle of the Confederates. 23 June 2011. pp. 193194. Archived from the original on 23 June 2011. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Montgomery Watt W. 1956. Muhammad At Medina. Osmania University Digital Library Of India. Oxford At The Clarendon Press. p. 35. This expedition receives scant notice in the sources but in some ways it is the most significant so far. As Dumah was some 800 km 500 mi from Medina there can have been no immediate threat to Muhammad but it may be as Caetani suggests 1 that communications with Syria were being interrupted and supplies to Medina stopped. It is tempting to suppose that was already envisaging something of the expansion which took place after his death.  The Art of the Umayyad Period 661750. Met Museum.  Syria History. Encyclopdia Britannica. Retrieved 25 January 2013.  Farhad Daftary. A Short History of the Ismailis. 1998 Edinburg UK. Edinburg University Press. Page 146.  Timeframe AD 12001300 The Mongol Conquests. TimeLife Books. 1989. pp. 5975. ISBN 9780809464371.  Battle of Aleppo. Everything2.com. 22 February 2003. Retrieved 25 January 2013.  The Eastern Mediterranean 14001600 A.D. Metmuseum.org. Archived from the original on 28 April 2009. Retrieved 23 April 2011.  Is This the End of Christianity in the Middle East. The New York Times. 22 July 2015.  a b Syria  Ottoman. Library of Congress Country Studies. Retrieved 25 January 2013. This article incorporates text from this source which is in the public domain.  a b Stanford J. Shaw Dynamics of Ottoman Society and administration in History of the Ottoman Empire and Modern Turkey  Pouring a People into the DesertThe Definitive Solution of the Unionists to the Armenian Question Fuat Dundar A Question of Genocide ed. Ronald Grigor Suny Fatma Muge Gocek and Norman M. Naimark Oxford University Press 2011 280281.  Mandat SyrieLiban PDF in French. Archived from the original PDF on 26 June 2008. Retrieved 25 January 2013.  James Barr 2011. a line in the sand. Britain France and the struggle that shaped the Middle East. Simon  Schuster. ISBN 9781847374530.  Peter N. Stearns William Leonard Langer 2001. The Middle East p. 761. The Encyclopedia of World History. Houghton Mifflin Books. ISBN 9780395652374.  a b c d e f g Background Note Syria. United States Department of State Bureau of Near Eastern Affairs May 2007. This article incorporates text from this source which is in the public domain.  Gelber 2006 pp. 138  Morris 2008 pp. 253 254  Tal 2004 pp. 251  a b c d e f g h i Syria World War II and independence. Britannica Online Encyclopedia. 23 May 2023.  Chen Chern 8 August 2018. Former Nazi Officers in the Near East German Military Advisors in Syria 194956. The International History Review. 40 4 732751. doi
10.1 080070753
32.2 0
17.1 367705. ISSN 07075332. S
2 CID 158837784.  Robson John 10 February 2012. Syria hasnt changed but the world has. Toronto Sun. Retrieved 25 January 2013.  Brecher Michael Jonathan Wilkenfeld 1997. A Study of Crisis. University of Michigan Press. pp. 345346. ISBN 9780472108060.  Wieland Carsten 2021. Syria and the Neutrality Trap. New York USA I.B. Tauris. ISBN 9780755641383.  Atassi Karim 2018. 6 The Fourth Republic. Syria the Strength of an Idea The Constitutional Architectures of Its Political Regimes. New York NY 10006 USA Cambridge University Press. p. 252. doi
10.1 0179781316872017. ISBN 9781107183605.cite book CS1 maint location link  Salah Jadid 63 Leader of Syria Deposed and Imprisoned by Assad. The New York Times. 24 August 1993.  a b Seale Patrick 1988. Asad The Struggle for the Middle East. University of California Press. ISBN 9780520069763.  Mark A. Tessler 1994. A History of the IsraeliPalestinian conflict. Indiana University Press. p. 382. ISBN 9780253208736.  A Campaign for the Books. Time. 1 September 1967. Archived from the original on 15 December 2008.  Line Khatib 23 May 2012. Islamic Revivalism in Syria The Rise and Fall of Bathist Secularism. Routledge. p. 34. ISBN 9780415782036.  Jordan asked Nixon to attack Syria declassified papers show. CNN. 28 November 2007. Retrieved 25 October 2008.  a b c Michael Brning 7 March 2011. The Sturdy House That Assad Built. Foreign Affairs.  P. Miller H. Rand Andrew Dafna 2020. 2 The Syrian Crucible and Future U.S. Options. ReEngaging the Middle East. Washington D.C USA Brookings Institution Press. p. 28. ISBN 9780815737629.cite book CS1 maint multiple names authors list link  Rabinovich Abraham 2005. The Yom Kippur War The Epic Encounter That Transformed the Middle East. New York City Schocken Books. p. 302. ISBN 9780805241761.  Itzchak Weismann. Sufism and Sufi Brotherhoods in Syria and Palestine. University of Oklahoma. Retrieved 30 January 2013.  Wright 2008 243244  Amos Deborah 2 February 2012. 30 Years Later Photos Emerge From Killings In Syria. NPR. Archived from the original on 2 February 2012.  Marc Perelman 11 July 2003. Syria Makes Overture Over Negotiations. Forward.com. Retrieved 25 October 2008.  George Alan 2003. Syria neither bread nor freedom. London Zed Books. pp. 5658. ISBN 9781842772133.  Ghadry Farid N. Winter 2005. Syrian Reform What Lies Beneath. The Middle East Quarterly.  Profile Syrias Bashar alAssad. BBC News. Retrieved 25 October 2008.  Huggler Justin 6 October 2003. Israel launches strikes on Syria in retaliation for bomb attack. The Independent. London. Archived from the original on 15 May 2011. Retrieved 23 October 2008.  Naharnet Newsdesk  Syria Curbs Kurdish Riots for a Merger with Iraqs Kurdistan. Naharnet.com. Retrieved 25 October 2008.  Guerin Orla 6 March 2005. Syria sidesteps Lebanon demands. BBC News. Retrieved 28 April 2010.  Last Syrian troops out of Lebanon. Los Angeles Times. 27 April 2005. Retrieved 17 March 2020.  Sanger David 14 October 2007. Israel Struck Syrian Nuclear Project Analysts Say. The New York Times. Retrieved 15 October 2007.  Syrian army tanks moving towards Hama. BBC News. 10 May 2011. Retrieved 18 May 2015.  Sengupta Kim 20 February 2012. Syrias sectarian war goes international as foreign fighters and arms pour into country. The Independent. Antakya. Archived from the original on 26 May 2022. Retrieved 22 February 2012.  Germany SPIEGEL ONLINE Hamburg 11 October 2016. Battle for Aleppo How Syria Became the New Global War. Der Spiegel. Archived from the original on 5 April 2017. Retrieved 4 April 2017. Syria has become a proxy war between the US and Russiacite news CS1 maint multiple names authors list link OConnor Tom 31 March 2017. Irans military leader tells U.S. to get out of Persian Gulf. Newsweek. Archived from the original on 5 April 2017. Retrieved 4 April 2017. The Gulf Arab faction especially Saudi Arabia has been engaged in a proxy war of regional influence with Iran  Syria deaths near 100000 says U.N.  and 6000 are children. The Guardian. 13 June 2013.  Carsten Paul 15 March 2012. Syria Bodies of 23 extreme torture victims found in Idlib as thousands rally for Assad. The Daily Telegraph. Archived from the original on 10 January 2022. Retrieved 25 January 2013.  Arab League delegates head to Syria over bloodbath. USA Today. 22 December 2011. Retrieved 26 June 2012. USA Today. 22 December 2011. Retrieved 25 January 2013.  Syria conflict Children targeted by snipers. BBC News. 24 November 2013. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees UNHCR. UNHCR Global Trends 2015. United Nations. Retrieved 15 September 2016.  Syria Refugees brace for more bloodshed. News24.com. 12 March 2012. Retrieved 25 January 2013.  Lara Jakes And Yahya Barzanji 14 March 2012. Syrian Kurds get cold reception from Iraqi Kurds. Yahoo News. Retrieved 30 January 2013.  Syria crisis number of refugees tops 
1.5  million says UN. The Guardian. 16 May 2013.  Syria Regional Refugee Response  Demographic Data of Registered Population Archived 19 February 2018 at the Wayback Machine. UNHCR.  Algemeiner The. Syrian Civil War Causes OneThird of Countrys Christians to Flee Their Homes. Algemeiner.com. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Syrian Civil War Fast Facts. CNN. 27 August 2013.  Syria may return to largerscale fighting UN warns in new report. Arab News. 14 September 2022. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Court Mireille Hond Chris Den 18 February 2020. Is This the End of Rojava. ISSN 00278378. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Letters 1 November 2019. We stand in solidarity with Rojava an example to the world  Letter. the Guardian. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Statement regarding Syrian Democratic Forces security operation in alHol camp. U.S. Central Command. Retrieved 19 January 2023.permanent dead link  The Syrian National Army The Turkish Proxy Militias of Northern Syria  Rojava Information Center. rojavainformationcenter.com. 21 July 2022. Archived from the original on 21 July 2022. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Operation ClawSword Exposes Blind Spots in the US NE Syria Strategy by Caroline Rose Aram Shabanian Calvin Wilder March 7 2023 website of new Lines Institute.  Turkey planned Syria military operation after Russia withdrawal sources reveal. Middle East Monitor. 5 June 2022. Retrieved 8 June 2022.  Syria USbacked SDF open to working with Syrian troops to fight off Turkey invasion. Middle East Eye. Retrieved 8 June 2022.  Agencies 7 June 2022. Russian regime forces boosted after Turkey signals Syria operation. Daily Sabah. Retrieved 8 June 2022.  President Erdoan reiterates determination for Syria operation  Trkiye News. Hrriyet Daily News. 8 August 2022. Retrieved 9 August 2022.  USBacked KurdishLed Forces Say Ready to Coordinate With Syrian Army Against Turkey Reuters via VOA website By Maya Gebeily June 5 2022.  Syria should use air defences against Turkish invasion The National June 6 2022.  These KurdishLed Forces Cannot Count On Syrian Air Defenses To Protect Them Against The Turkish Air Force Paul Iddon Jun 20 2022.  Kurdish Syrian Iranian forces coordinate ahead of Turkish operationKurdish units and Iranianaffiliated factions in Syria have formed a joint operations room under Russian supervision to counter a possible Turkish military operation in northern Syria. by Mohammed Hardan June 17 2022. almonitor.com  USbacked Syrian Kurds to turn to Damascus if Turkey attacks. The U.S.backed and Kurdishled forces in northern Syria say they will turn to the government in Damascus for support should Turkey go ahead with its threat to launch a new incursion into the wartorn country. By BASSEM MROUE Associated Press June 7 2022.  SDF Syrian Regime Agree on Defense Plan to Repel Turkish Attack Wednesday by Qamishli  Kamal Sheikho 6 July 2022.  DISPATCH FROM SYRIA DEMOCRATIC FORCES PREPARE FOR TURKISH INVASIONThe regional government in north and east Syria declares a state of emergency as Turkey threatens invasion. Troops on the front say theyre ready for war. by Michael R. Shea July 8 2022.  Twelve years on from the beginning of Syrias war By Al Jazeera Staff 15 Mar 2023.  Security Council 12 years of war leaves 70 per cent of Syrians needing aid. United Nations. 25 January 2023.  Sixteenth report of the SecretaryGeneral on the threat posed by ISIL Daesh to international peace and security and the range of United Nations efforts in support of Member States in countering the threat UN official website February 2023.  CENTCOM  YEAR IN REVIEW 2022 THE FIGHT AGAINST ISIS USCENTCOM official website of US Army Central Command Dec. 29 2022.  ExIslamic State fighters still pose a risk in Turkey finds report By Joshua Askew March 1 2023.  AlKhalidi Suleiman 10 June 2020. Protests hit Druze city in Syria for fourth day. Reuters.  Syria war Assad sacks PM as economic crisis sparks protests. BBC News. 11 June 2020.  Syrian pound hits record low ahead of new U.S. sanctions dealers. Reuters. 8 June 2020. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Syrian currency collapse throws country into uncertainty. The Jerusalem Post  JPost.com. 8 June 2020. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Syrian currency loses more value as sanctions hit. www.rudaw.net. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Goodridge Hugo 4 June 2020. Charting the dramatic collapse of Syrias national currency. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Lister Charles 11 June 2020. Is Assad About to Fall. POLITICO. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Browne Gareth 8 June 2020. Assad faces backlash in Syria as economy crashes. The Telegraph. ISSN 03071235. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  McLoughlin Paul 7 June 2020. Syria Insight Syrias collapsing economy threatens Assads rule. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Iddon Paul 9 June 2020. Russias expanding military footprint in the Middle East. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Chulov Martin 12 June 2020. US Caesar Act sanctions could devastate Syrias flatlining economy. Critics say legislation is being used for US strategy and could cause further problems for country and wider region. The Guardian.  Syria Economic Meltdown Presents New Challenge for Assad. VOA. 12 June 2020. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Syria approves 
5.3 bn budget for 2022 as economic crisis hits finances. Middle East Eye. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  2022 Look Ahead No end to suffering in sight for warweary Syrians. Arab News. 1 January 2022. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  The future looks grim for beleaguered Syrians. Arab News. 4 January 2022. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Ula enab10 30 December 2021. Syrias wheat crisis foreshadows a famine. Enab Baladi. Retrieved 19 January 2023.cite web CS1 maint numeric names authors list link  RA enab07 30 November 2021. US Russia and Israel support energy supply despite Caesar Act. Enab Baladi. Retrieved 19 January 2023.cite web CS1 maint numeric names authors list link  F. A. Schaeffer Claude 2003. Syria and the Cradle of Civilization The Findings of Claude F a Schaeffer in Ras Shamra. Trubner  Company. ISBN 9781844531295.  Egyptian Journal of Geology  Volume 42 Issue 1  Page 263 1998  Dinerstein Eric et al. 2017. An EcoregionBased Approach to Protecting Half the Terrestrial Realm. BioScience. 67 6 534545. doi
10.1 0
93 bioscibix014. ISSN 00063568. PMC 5451287. PMID 28608869.  Grantham H. S. et al. 2020. Anthropogenic modification of forests means only 40 of remaining forests have high ecosystem integrity  Supplementary Material. Nature Communications. 11 1 5978. Bibcode20
20 NatCo..
11.5 9
78 G. doi
10.1 0
38 s41467020194933. ISSN 20411723. PMC 7723057. PMID 33293507.   Syrian Arab Republic. Federal Foreign Office. 13 January 2023. Archived from the original on 25 March 2023. Syria Government. CIA World Factbook. Archived from the original on 3 February 2021. Syria Government. Archived from the original on 27 January 2023. Syrian Arab Republic Constitution 2012. refworld. 26 February 2021. Archived from the original on 5 March 2019.  Syria Government. CIA World Factbook. Archived from the original on 3 February 2021.  Syrian Arab Republic Constitution 2012. refworld. 26 February 2021. Archived from the original on 5 March 2019.  Freedom in the World 2023 Syria. Freedom House. Archived from the original on 9 March 2023.  Lucas Scott 25 February 2021. How Assad Regime Tightened Syrias OneParty Rule. EA Worldview. Archived from the original on 25 February 2021.  Szmolk Inmaculada 2017. Political Change in the Middle East and North Africa After the Arab Spring. Edinburgh United Kingdom Edinburgh University Press. pp. 132133 414417. ISBN 978147441528 6.   Khamis B. Gold Vaughn Sahar Paul Katherine 2013. 22. Propaganda in Egypt and Syrias Cyberwars Contexts Actors Tools and Tactics. In Auerbach Castronovo Jonathan Russ ed.. The Oxford Handbook of Propaganda Studies. 198 Madison Avenue New York NY 10016 Oxford University Press. p. 422. ISBN 9780199764419.cite book CS1 maint location link CS1 maint multiple names authors list link Wieland Carsten 2018. 6 Deneutralizing Aid All Roads Lead to Damascus. Syria and the Neutrality Trap The Dilemmas of Delivering Humanitarian Aid Through Violent Regimes. 50 Bedford Square London WC
1 B 
3 DP UK I. B. Tauris. p. 68. ISBN 9780755641383.cite book CS1 maint location link Ahmed Saladdin 2019. Totalitarian Space and the Destruction of Aura. State University of New York Press Albany Suny Press. pp. 144 149. ISBN 9781438472911. Hensman Rohini 2018. 7 The Syrian Uprising. Indefensible Democracy Counterrevolution and the Rhetoric of AntiImperialism. Chicago Illinois Haymarket Books. ISBN 9781608469123.  Freedom in the World 2023 Syria. Freedom House. Archived from the original on 9 March 2023.  Freedom in the World 2023 PDF 
50 th anniversary ed.. March 2023 31  via Freedom House. cite journal Cite journal requires journal help  Constitution of Syria. Articles 83118. 15 February 2012. Retrieved 30 January 2013  via Scribd.  Constitution of Syria. Article 75124. 15 February 2012. Retrieved 30 January 2013  via Scribd.  Constitution of Syria. Article 772. 15 February 2012. Retrieved 30 January 2013  via Scribd.  Constitution of Syria. Retrieved 22 October 2008.  Alianak Sonia 2007. Middle Eastern Leaders and Islam A Precarious Equilibrium. Peter Lang. p. 55. ISBN 9780820469249.  a b c Syria 0507. State.gov. Retrieved 25 October 2008.  Syria Elections without Politics. Carnegie Endowment.  Schlager Weisblatt Neil Jayne A. Faksh Mahmud 2006. Syrian Arab Republic. World Encyclopedia of Political Systems and Parties 
4 th ed.. 132 West 
31 st Street New York NY 10001 USA Facts on File. p. 1303. ISBN 0816059535.cite book CS1 maint location link CS1 maint multiple names authors list link  Syria clamps down on Kurd parties. BBC News. 3 June 2004. Retrieved 22 October 2008.  Freedom in the World 2023 Syria. Freedom House. Archived from the original on 9 March 2023.  a b Decrees on Ending State of Emergency Abolishing SSSC Regulating Right to Peaceful Demonstration. Syrian Arab News Agency. 22 April 2011. Archived from the original on 28 March 2012. Retrieved 30 January 2013.  Syria. Carnegie Endowment for International Peace. p. 13.  Syria Syrian Arab Republic. Law.emory.edu. Retrieved 18 February 2013.  Black Ian 26 March 2013. Syrian opposition takes Arab League seat. The Guardian.  Syria conflict UK recognises opposition says William Hague. BBC. 20 November 2012. Retrieved 28 August 2013.  Hugh Schofield 13 November 2012. Syria France backs antiAssad coalition. BBC. Retrieved 28 August 2013.  Madhani Aamer 12 December 2012. Obama says U.S. will recognize Syrian opposition. USA Today.  Shaar Akil Karam Samy 28 January 2021. Inside Syrias Clapping Chamber Dynamics of the 2020 Parliamentary Elections. Middle East Institute. Archived from the original on 28 January 2021.cite web CS1 maint multiple names authors list link  Awad Favier Ziad Agns 30 April 2020. Elections in Wartime The Syrian Peoples Council 20162020 PDF. European University Institute. Archived from the original PDF on 29 January 2021  via cadmus.eui.eu. cite journal Cite journal requires journal helpCS1 maint multiple names authors list link  Abdel Nour Aymen 24 July 2020. Syrias 2020 parliamentary elections The worst joke yet. Middle East Institute. Archived from the original on 28 January 2021.    13 April 2016.        . euronews.com.         . efsyn.gr. 13 April 2016. Archived from the original on 16 April 2016. Retrieved 15 April 2016.  Kossaify Ephrem 22 April 2021. UN reiterates it is not involved in Syrian presidential election. Arab News. Archived from the original on 22 April 2021.  Cheeseman Nicholas 2019. How to Rig an Election. Yale University Press. pp. 140141. ISBN 9780300246650. OCLC 1089560229.  Norris Pippa Martinez i Coma Ferran Grmping Max 2015. The Year in Elections 2014. Election Integrity Project. Archived from the original on 15 April 2021. Retrieved 12 May 2023. The Syrian election ranked as worst among all the contests held during 2014.  Abdel Nour Aymen 24 July 2020. Syrias 2020 parliamentary elections The worst joke yet. Middle East Institute. Archived from the original on 28 January 2021.  Electoral Integrity Global Report 20192021. Electoral Integrity Project. May 2022. Archived from the original on 9 December 2022.  Garnett S. James MacGregor Holly Ann Toby Madison . May 2022. 2022. Year in Elections Global Report 20192021. The Electoral Integrity Project PDF. Electoral Integrity Project. University of East Anglia. Archived from the original PDF on 22 July 2022.cite web CS1 maint multiple names authors list link  Lister 2015 p. 154. sfnp error no target CITEREFLister2015 help  Allsopp  van Wilgenburg 2019 p. 89. sfnp error no target CITEREFAllsoppvanWilgenburg2019 help  Rojava no longer exists Northern Syria adopted instead. Kurdistan24.  Allsopp  van Wilgenburg 2019 pp. 11 95. sfnp error no target CITEREFAllsoppvanWilgenburg2019 help  Zabad 2017 pp. 219 228. sfnp error no target CITEREFZabad2017 help  Allsopp  van Wilgenburg 2019 pp. 9798. sfnp error no target CITEREFAllsoppvanWilgenburg2019 help  Delegation from the Democratic administration of Selfparticipate of selfparticipate in the first and second conference of the Shaba region. Cantonafrin.com. 4 February 2016. Archived from the original on 9 August 2016. Retrieved 12 June 2016.  Turkeys Syria offensive explained in four maps. BBC News. 14 October 2019. Retrieved 1 November 2019.  Syria Kurds adopt constitution for autonomous federal region. TheNewArab. 31 December 2016. Archived from the original on 5 October 2018. Retrieved 5 October 2018.  Syrias war Assad on the offensive. The Economist. 13 February 2016. Retrieved 1 May 2016.  Umar Catalonian recognition of AANES is the beginning. Hawar News Agency. 26 October 2021. Archived from the original on 26 October 2021. Retrieved 27 October 2021.  van Wilgenburg Wladimir 21 October 2021. Catalan parliament recognizes administration in northeast Syria. Kurdistan24. Archived from the original on 21 October 2021. Retrieved 27 October 2021.  a b Shahvisi Arianne 2018. Beyond Orientalism Exploring the Distinctive Feminism of democratic confederalism in Rojava. Geopolitics. 26 4 125. doi
10.1 080146500
45.2 0
18.1 554564. S
2 CID 149972015.  German MP Jelpke Rojava needs help against Corona pandemic. ANF News.  imek Bahar Jongerden Joost 29 October 2018. Gender Revolution in Rojava The Voices beyond Tabloid Geopolitics. Geopolitics. 26 4 10231045. doi
10.1 080146500
45.2 0
18.1 531283. hdl188787090.  Bur Rosa 22 May 2020. Nonterritorial autonomy and gender equality The case of the Autonomous Administration of North and East Syria  Rojava PDF. Philosophy and Society. 31 3 277448. doi
10.2 2
98 FID20033
19 B. S
2 CID 226412887.  Gammer Moshe 2004. The Caspian Region The Caucasus. Vol. 2. Routledge. p. 64. ISBN 9780203005125.  Allsopp  van Wilgenburg 2019 pp. xviii 112. sfnp error no target CITEREFAllsoppvanWilgenburg2019 help  Zabad 2017 pp. 219 228229. sfnp error no target CITEREFZabad2017 help  Schmidinger Thomas 2019. The Battle for the Mountain of the Kurds. Translated by Schiffmann Thomas. Oakland CA PM Press Kairos. p. 12. ISBN 9781629636511. Afrin was the home to the largest Ezidi minority in Syria.  Allsopp  van Wilgenburg 2019 pp. xviii 66 200. sfnp error no target CITEREFAllsoppvanWilgenburg2019 help  Syria Kurds challenging traditions promote civil marriage. ARA News. 20 February 2016. Archived from the original on 22 February 2016. Retrieved 23 August 2016.  Zabad 2017 p. 219. sfnp error no target CITEREFZabad2017 help  Allsopp  van Wilgenburg 2019 pp. 156163. sfnp error no target CITEREFAllsoppvanWilgenburg2019 help  PYD leader SDF operation for Raqqa countryside in progress Syria can only be secular. ARA News. 28 May 2016. Archived from the original on 1 October 2016. Retrieved 8 October 2016.  Ross Carne 30 September 2015. The Kurds Democratic Experiment. The New York Times. Retrieved 20 May 2016.  In der Maur Rene Staal Jonas 2015. Introduction. Stateless Democracy PDF. Utrecht BAK. p. 19. ISBN 9789077288221. Archived from the original PDF on 25 October 2016. Retrieved 19 April 2016.  Jongerden Joost 6 December 2012. Rethinking Politics and Democracy in the Middle East PDF. Ekurd.net. Archived from the original PDF on 15 March 2016. Retrieved 9 October 2016.  Allsopp  van Wilgenburg 2019 pp. 94 130131 184. sfnp error no target CITEREFAllsoppvanWilgenburg2019 help  Knapp Michael Jongerden Joost 2014. Communal Democracy The Social Contract and Confederalism in Rojava. Comparative Islamic Studies. 10 1 87109. doi
10.1 5
58 cis.29642. ISSN 17431638.  Kk Blent zseluk Ceren 1 January 2016. The Rojava Experience Possibilities and Challenges of Building a Democratic Life. South Atlantic Quarterly. 115 1 184196. doi
10.1 215003828763425013  via read.dukeupress.edu.  Barkhoda Dalir. The Experiment of the Rojava System in Grassroots Participatory Democracy Its Theoretical Foundation Structure and Strategies. cite journal Cite journal requires journal help  Gerber Damian Brincat Shannon 2018. When calan met Bookchin The Kurdish Freedom Movement and the Political Theory of Democratic Confederalism. Geopolitics. 26 4 125. doi
10.1 080146500
45.2 0
18.1 508016. S
2 CID 150297675.  NATIONBUILDING IN ROJAVA PARTICIPATORY DEMOCRACY AMIDST THE SYRIAN CIVL WAR PDF. Imemo.ru. Retrieved 4 December 2021.  RUPTURES AND RIPPLE EFFECTS IN THE MIDDLE EAST AND BEYOND PDF. Repository.bilkent.edu.tr. Retrieved 4 December 2021.  Report Syrian army to enter SDFheld Kobani Manbij. Reuters. 14 October 2019. Retrieved 1 November 2019.  Syrian army to deploy along Turkish border in deal with Kurdishled forces. Reuters. 14 October 2019. Retrieved 1 November 2019.  Syrian army moves to confront Turkish forces as US withdraws. Times of Israel. 14 October 2019. Retrieved 1 November 2019.  Syrian Kurds accuse Turkey of violations Russia says peace plan on track. Reuters. 24 October 2019. Retrieved 1 November 2019.  Strenger Carlo 8 February 2012. Assad takes a page out of Russias book in his war against rebels. Haaretz. Retrieved 15 January 2013.  MacFarquhar Neil 12 November 2011. Arab League Votes to Suspend Syria. The New York Times. Retrieved 12 November 2011.  Syria suspends its membership in Mediterranean union. Xinhua News Agency. 1 December 2012. Archived from the original on 6 December 2011.  Arab League brings Syria back into its fold after 12 years. Al Jazeera. 7 May 2023. Archived from the original on 7 May 2023.  Morris Chris 2005. Chapter 9 Crossroads. The New Turkey. London Granta Books. pp. 203227. ISBN 9781862078659.  Sanjian Avedis K. 1956. The Sanjak of Alexandretta Hatay Its Impact on TurkishSyrian Relations 19391956. The Middle East Journal. 10 4 379394. JSTOR 4322848. Retrieved 22 December 2022.  The international community maintains that the Israeli decision to impose its laws jurisdiction and administration in the occupied Syrian Golan is null and void and without international legal effect. International Labour Office 2009. The situation of workers of the occupied Arab territories International government publication ed.. International Labour Office. p. 23. ISBN 9789221206309..  ...occupied Syrian Golan Heights... The Arab Peace Initiative 2002 Archived 4 June 2009 at the Wayback Machine www.albab.com. Retrieved 1 August 2010. In 2008 a plenary session of the United Nations General Assembly voted by 1611 in favor of a motion on the occupied Syrian Golan that reaffirmed support for UN Resolution 497. General Assembly adopts broad range of texts 26 in all on recommendation of its fourth Committee including on decolonization information Palestine refugees United Nations 5 December 2008. the Syrian Golan Heights territory which Israel has occupied since 1967. Also the Golan Heights a 4
50 square mile portion of southwestern Syria that Israel occupied during the 1967 ArabIsraeli war. CRS Issue Brief for Congress Syria U.S. Relations and Bilateral Issues Congressional Research Service. 19 January 2006  Occupied territory Israelioccupied Golan Heights Central Intelligence Agency. CIA World Factbook 2010 Skyhorse Publishing Inc. 2009. p. 339. ISBN 1602397279. ...the United States considers the Golan Heights to be occupied territory subject to negotiation and Israeli withdrawal... CRS Issue Brief for Congress IsraeliUnited States Relations Congressional Research Service 5 April 2002. pg. 5. Retrieved 1 August 2010. Occupied Golan Heights Travel advice Israel and the Occupied Palestinian Territories Archived 20 July 2009 at the Wayback Machine UK Foreign and Commonwealth Office. Retrieved 1 August 2010. In the ICRCs view the Golan is an occupied territory. ICRC activities in the occupied Golan during 2007 International Committee of the Red Cross 24 April 2008.  About Us  AlMarsad  . 12 October 2020. Retrieved 19 January 2023.  Resolving the Future of the Occupied Syrian Golan PDF. Old Dominion University Model United Nations.  The jungle is back. With his Golan Heights tweet Trump emboldens the annexation agendas of the worlds strongmen. The Globe and Mail. 22 March 2019.  Political foe of Syrians wounded on Beirut street. Tampa Bay Times previously named the St. Petersburg Times through 2011. St. Petersburg Times. 12 November 1976. Retrieved 17 March 2020.  Syrias role in Lebanon. Al Jazeera. Retrieved 11 August 2020.  Syrian troops leave Lebanese soil. BBC News. BBC. 26 April 2005. Retrieved 11 August 2020.  Israeli views on Shebaa Farms harden. BBC News. 25 August 2006.  Berman Yaniv Line Media 8 October 2006. Shebaa Farms  nub of conflict. Ynetnews.  Har Dov withdrawal not on the table. The Jerusalem Post. 26 July 2006.  Syria reduces compulsory military service by three months. China Daily. 20 March 2011. Archived from the original on 3 May 2011. Retrieved 23 April 2011.  Syrias embrace of WMDdead link by Eyal Zisser The Globe and Mail 28 September 2004 link leads only to abstract purchase necessary for full article. EYAL ZISSER 28 September 2004. Syrias embrace of WMD. The Globe and Mail. p. A21. Archived from the original on 16 January 2009.  Syria among worst for rights abuses HRW report. Reuters. 24 January 2011.  Guy Dinmore 31 March 2006. Bush enters debate on freedom in Iran. Financial Times. Archived from the original on 11 March 2018. Retrieved 6 April 2006.subscription required  Freedom in the World Report Syria. January 2011. Archived from the original on 23 December 2011. Retrieved 22 August 2011.  Syria Families of Disappeared Deserve Answers. Human Rights Watch. 30 November 2022. Archived from the original on 1 February 2023.  A76890 Missing people in the Syrian Arab Republic  Report of the SecretaryGeneral. United NationsOHCHR. 2 August 2022. Archived from the original on 5 January 2023.  a b Syria Events of 2008. Human Rights Watch. 13 January 2009.  Joe Lauria 29 November 2011. More than 250 children among dead U.N. says. The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 29 November 2011.  UN report Syrian forces commit gross violations of human rights CNN. 29 November 2011.  200 massacred in Hama claim Syrian activists. 13 July 2012.  Iran warns west against military intervention in Syria. The Guardian. 27 August 2013. Retrieved 28 August 2013.  Gsten Susanne 13 February 2013. Christians Squeezed Out by Violent Struggle in North Syria. The New York Times.  Behari Elad 23 December 2011. Syria Sunnis Threatening to Massacre Minority Alawites. Arutz Sheva.  Syria Chemical weapons pose unacceptable threat and are a danger to us all. UN News. 5 January 2023. Archived from the original on 18 February 2023.  Syrias Chemical Weapons Declaration Remains Incomplete Disarmament Chief Tells Security Council. 8 May 2023. Archived from the original on 11 May 2023.  Griffin Jennifer 6 April 2017. US launches missiles into Syria in response to chemical weapons attack. Fox News.  Loveluck Louisa 6 April 2017. Deadly nerve agent sarin used in Syria attack Turkish Health Ministry says. The Washington Post.  US claims 2019 Syria airstrike investigated by NY Times legitimate. France 24. 15 November 2021. Retrieved 9 May 2022.  Heydemann Steven. Authoritarianism in Syria. Ithaca Cornell UP 1999. Print. Pg.110  a b c d Heydemann Steven. Authoritarianism in Syria. Ithaca Cornell UP 1999. Print.  Heydemann Steven. Authoritarianism in Syria. Ithaca Cornell UP 1999. Print. Pg 111.  a b Syria regime revenues shrink as losses mount. The Daily Star. Agence FrancePresse. 30 May 2015. Retrieved 31 May 2015.  Iran spends billions to prop up Assad. TDA. Bloomberg. 11 June 2015. Retrieved 11 June 2015.  Syrias economy cut in half by conflict. BBC News. 23 June 2015. Retrieved 24 June 2015.  Country and Lending Groups. World Bank. Archived from the original on 18 March 2011. Retrieved 26 July 2012.  a b c Syria Country Brief September 2010 PDF. World Bank.  Transactions of the American Institute of Mining and Metallurgical Engineers. The Institute of Mining and Metallurgical Engineers. 1921.  a b Syria Weighs Its Tactics as Pillars of Its Economy Continue to Crumble. The New York Times. 13 July 2013. Retrieved 13 July 2013.  a b c Economic Challenges and Reform Options for Syria A Growth Diagnostics Report PDF. World Bank. 21 February 2011. p. 10.  a b Syria. Index of Economic Freedom.  Syria reverts to socialist economic policies to ease tension. Reuters. 4 July 2012. Retrieved 27 October 2012.  a b c Syrias battling economy may hold on with help from friends. Agence FrancePresse. Archived from the original on 23 August 2012. Retrieved 28 August 2012.  Syrias ailing economy hits citizens and regime. Financial Times. 6 February 2012. Retrieved 24 August 2012.  Syrian Economy To Shrink By 20 Percent in 2012 As Country Struggles With War. HuffPost. 12 October 2012.  Syrians struggle with shortages as economy buckles. Associated Press. 22 January 2013. Archived from the original on 13 May 2013.  a b c d The Syrian Economy Hanging by a Thread. Carnegie Endowment for International Peace. 20 June 2012.  Sherlock Ruth 27 May 2015. Isil seizes Syrian regimes lucrative phosphate mines. The Telegraph. Archived from the original on 10 January 2022. Retrieved 11 June 2015.  IS blows up Syria gas pipeline serving capital monitor. Yahoo News. Agence FrancePresse. 10 June 2015. Retrieved 11 June 2015.  Shaheen Kareem 11 June 2015. String of losses in Syria leaves Assad regime increasingly precarious. The Guardian. Retrieved 11 June 2015.  a b c Hubbard Ben Saad Hwaida 5 December 2021. On Syrias Ruins a Drug Empire Flourishes. The New York Times. ISSN 03624331. Archived from the original on 28 December 2021. Retrieved 6 December 2021.  Rose Sderholm Caroline Alexander April 2022. The Captagon Threat A Profile of Illicit Trade Consumption and Regional Realities PDF. New Lines Institute 239. Archived from the original PDF on 12 April 2022. cite journal Cite journal requires journal helpCS1 maint multiple names authors list link  Is the Syrian Regime the Worlds Biggest Drug Dealer. Vice World News. 14 December 2022. Archived from the original on 15 December 2022.  Syria has become a narcostate. The Economist. 19 July 2021. ISSN 00130613. Retrieved 27 December 2023.  AlKhalidi Suleiman 27 January 2015. Syria raises fuel prices to snuff out black market soothe unrest. Reuters. Retrieved 28 January 2015.  Syrias oil production on Index Mundi. Retrieved 15 October 2016.  Syria. Matthew Bennett Turismo y Comunicaciones Spain. Ministerio de Transportes. Madrid EBizguides. 2007. p. 210. ISBN 9788493520205. OCLC 144596963.cite book CS1 maint others link  How to travel by train from London to Syria  Train travel in Syria. Seat61.com. Retrieved 25 October 2008.    . Moct.gov.sy. Archived from the original on 20 August 2013. Retrieved 28 August 2013.  ATT  
4 G LTE Cell Phones Uverse TV Internet  Phone Service. Ste.gov.sy. Archived from the original on 23 July 2013. Retrieved 28 August 2013.  Katerji Oz 4 April 2013. The Syrian Electronic Army Are at Cyber War with Anonymous. Vice magazine. Retrieved 28 August 2013.  Eissa T Cho GiHwan 2013. Internet Anonymity in Syria Challenges and Solution. IT Convergence and Security 2012. Lecture Notes in Electrical Engineering. Vol. 215. pp. 177186. doi
10.1 007978940075860521. ISBN 9789400758599.  Salman M. Mualla W. 1 March 2004 The utilization of water resources for agriculture in syria analysis of the current situation and future challenges International Seminar on Nuclear War and Planetary Emergencies  
30 th Session The Science and Culture Series  Nuclear Strategy and Peace Technology WORLD SCIENTIFIC pp. 263274 doi
10.1 14297898127027530031 ISBN 9789812388209 retrieved 19 January 2023  Growth after War in Syria PDF.  World Bank 2001. Syrian Arab Republic Irrigation Sector Report. Rural Development Water and Environment Group Middle East and North Africa Region Report No. 226
02 SYR 1  World Population Prospects  Population Division. United Nations.  Population Existed in Syria According To Censuses 1960 1970 1981 1994 2004 And Estimates of Their Number in Mid Years 20052011000. Central Bureau of Statistics. Archived from the original on 23 October 2015. Retrieved 18 October 2015.  INTRODUCTIONSYRIACONTEXT PDF. Pead Tracey.  World Refugee Survey 2008. U.S. Committee for Refugees and Immigrants. 19 June 2008. Archived from the original on 28 December 2012.  Politi Daniel 30 August 2014. U.N. Syria Crisis Is Biggest Humanitarian Emergency of Our Era. Slate. Retrieved 1 September 2014.  Nebehay Stephanie 29 August 2014. Syrian refugees top 3 million half of all Syrians displaced  U.N. Reuters. Retrieved 29 August 2014.  Demographic Data of Registered Population. United Nations High Commission for Refugees. Archived from the original on 19 February 2018. Retrieved 29 August 2014.  11 March 2020  The Refugee Brief. The Refugee Brief. 11 March 2020. Retrieved 20 May 2021.  Richards M Rengo C Cruciani F Gratrix F Wilson JF Scozzari R MacAulay V Torroni A 2003. Extensive FemaleMediated Gene Flow from SubSaharan Africa into Near Eastern Arab Populations. American Journal of Human Genetics. 72 4 10581064. doi
10.1 086374384. PMC 1180338. PMID 12629598.  In the Wake of the Phoenicians DNA study reveals a PhoenicianMaltese link. National Geographic Magazine. October 2004. Archived from the original on 29 August 2008. Retrieved 30 January 2013.  Syrias Assyrians threatened by extremists  AlMonitor the Pulse of the Middle East. AlMonitor. Retrieved 24 July 2014.  TurkeySyria deal allows Syriacs to cross border for religious holidays. Todays Zaman. 26 April 2008. Archived from the original on 11 May 2011. Retrieved 23 April 2011.  a b Syria  Kurds. Library of Congress Country Studies.  a b c d e f g Khalifa Mustafa 2013 The impossible partition of Syria Arab Reform Initiative 35 Arabs constitute the major ethnic group in Syria making up between 80 and 85 of the population. Kurds are the second largest ethnic group in Syria making up around 10 of the Syrian population and distributed among four regions...with a Yazidi minority that numbers around 40000... Turkmen are the thirdlargest ethnic group in Syria making up around 45 of the population. Some estimations indicate that they are the second biggest group outnumbering Kurds drawing on the fact that Turkmen are divided into two groups the rural Turkmen who make up 30 of the Turkmen in Syria and have kept their mother tongue and the urban Turkmen who have become Arabised and no longer speak their mother language... Assyrians are the fourthlargest ethnic group in Syria. They represent the original and oldest inhabitants of Syria today making up around 34 of the Syrian population... Circassians are the fifthlargest ethnic group in Syria making up around 
1.5  of the population... Armenians are sixthlargest ethnic group in Syria making up around 1 of the population... There are also a small number of other ethnic groups in Syria including Greeks Persians Albanians Bosnian Pashtuns Russians and Georgians...  Who are the Turkmen in Syria. BBC News. BBC. 2015. There are no reliable population figures but they are estimated to number between about half a million and 
3.5  million.  Who Are the Turkmens of Syria. The New York Times. 2015. Q. How many are there A. No reliable figures are available and estimates on the number of Turkmens in Syria and nearby countries vary widely from the hundreds of thousands up to 3 million or more.  Peyrouse Sebastien 2015 Turkmenistan Strategies of Power Dilemmas of Development Routledge p. 62 ISBN 9780230115521 There are nearly one million Turkmen in Syria...  The Arabs of Brazil. Saudi Aramco World. SeptemberOctober 2005. Archived from the original on 26 November 2005. Retrieved 30 January 2013.  United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. UN refugee agency welcomes Brazil announcement of humanitarian visas for Syrians. United Nations High Commission for Refugees. Retrieved 24 July 2014.  Inmigracion siriolibanesa en Argentina in Spanish. Confederacin de Entidades Argentino rabes. Archived from the original on 20 June 2010. Retrieved 30 January 2013.  a b c d e f g h Behnstedt Peter 2008 Syria Encyclopedia of Arabic language and linguistics vol. 4 Brill Publishers p. 402 ISBN 9789004144767  What Languages Are Spoken in Syria. WorldAtlas. 1 August 2017. Retrieved 9 May 2022.  a b Drysdale Alasdair Hinnebusch Raymond A. 1991 Syria and the Middle East Peace Process Council on Foreign Relations p. 222 ISBN 9780876091050  Danna Nissim December 2003. The Druze in the Middle East Their Faith Leadership Identity and Status. Brighton Sussex Academic Press. p. 227. ISBN 9781903900369.  Pipes Daniel 1 January 1989. The Alawi Capture of Power in Syria. Middle Eastern Studies. 25 4 429450. doi
10.1 08000263208908700793. JSTOR 4283331. S
2 CID 143250254.  More than 570 thousand people were killed on the Syrian territory within 8 years of revolution demanding freedom democracy justice and equality. The Syrian Observatory for Human Rights. 15 March 2019.  Death toll in Syria likely as high as 120000 group. Reuters. 14 May 2013.  Tomader Fateh 25 October 2008. Patriarch of Antioch I will be judged if I do not carry the Church and each one of you in my heart. Forward Magazine. Archived from the original on 2 March 2010. Retrieved 30 January 2013.  Syrias president wants nonMuslim religions to help end his pariah status. The Economist. 13 July 2023. ISSN 00130613. Retrieved 27 December 2023.  Jews of Syria. www.jewishvirtuallibrary.org.  U.S. Relations With Syria. State.gov. 24 October 2012. Retrieved 25 January 2013.  Syrias Education System  Report  June 2001 PDF. Archived from the original PDF on 11 May 2011. Retrieved 23 April 2011.  Syria  Education. Countrystudies.us. Retrieved 25 October 2008.  Ministry of Higher Education 23 November 2011. Public universities. Ministry of Higher Education. Archived from the original on 13 November 2012. Retrieved 22 January 2013.  Private universities. Ministry of Higher Education. 23 November 2011. Archived from the original on 13 November 2012. Retrieved 22 January 2013.  Forward Magazine Interview with President of Damascus University. February 2008. Archived from the original on 18 June 2008.  Forward Magazine Interview with President of Aleppo University May 2008. Archived 6 September 2015 at the Wayback Machine  Getting education right. March 2008. Archived from the original on 3 October 2010.  Syrian Arab Republic. Ranking Web of Universities. Retrieved 26 February 2013.  Health. SESRIC. Archived from the original on 13 May 2013. Retrieved 5 March 2013.  Demography. SESRIC. Retrieved 5 March 2013.  Hopwood Derek 1988. Syria 19451986 Politics and Society. Routledge. ISBN 9780044450399.  Salamandra Christa 2004. A New Old Damascus Authenticity and Distinction in Urban Syria. Indiana University Press. p. 103. ISBN 9780253217226.  Syria Events of 2018. World Report 2019 Rights Trends in Syria. Human Rights Watch. 17 December 2018.  OHCHR  IICISyria Independent International Commission of Inquiry on the Syrian Arab Republic. www.ohchr.org. Retrieved 19 October 2020.  Salti Rasha 2006. Insights into Syrian Cinema Essays and Conversations with Contemporary Filmmakers. ArteEast. ISBN 9781892494702.  Freedom House report on Syria 2010 PDF. Freedom House. Archived from the original PDF on 27 December 2010.  Wright Robin 2008. Dreams and shadows the Future of the Middle East. Penguin Press. p. 214. ISBN 9781594201110. more than one dozen intelligence agencies  Wright Robin 2008. Dreams and shadows the Future of the Middle East. Penguin Press. p. 230. ISBN 9781594201110. hundreds of thousands of mukhabarat according to dissident Riad Seif  Akram Raslan How Caricatures Shake Tyranny. Syria Untold. 13 April 2015. Retrieved 23 September 2015.  Damascus. Raidi Teilifs ireann. 15 October 2009. Archived from the original on 4 December 2009. Retrieved 26 November 2009. General references Boczek Boleslaw Adam 2006. International Law A Dictionary. Scarecrow Press. ISBN 0810850788 Finkelstein Norman 2003. Image and reality of the IsraelPalestine conflict. Verso. ISBN 9781859844427. Glass Charles 1990 Tribes with Flags A Dangerous Passage Through the Chaos of the Middle East Atlantic Monthly Press New York and Picador London ISBN 9780436181306. Karoubi Mohammad Taghi 2004. Just or Unjust War Ashgate Publishing ISBN 0754623750 Forward Magazine Syrias English monthly since 2007. Orsam Suriye Trkleri RaporuOrsam Syria Turks Wright Robin. 2008. Dreams and Shadows  the Future of the Middle East. Penguin. Further reading van Dam Nikolaos 2011 The Struggle for Power in Syria Politics and Society under Asad and the Baath Party I. B. Tauris. Dawisha A. I. 1980. Syria and the Lebanese Crisis. St. Martins Press. ISBN 9780312782030. Lawson Fred H 2010 Demystifying Syria Saqi. Maoz M. 1986. Yaniv A ed.. Syria Under Assad. St. Martins Press. ISBN 9780312782061. Paton L. B. 1981. The Early History of Syria and Palestine. ISBN 9781113538222. Sahner Christian C. 2014. Among the Ruins Syria Past and Present. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780199396702. Schlicht Alfred 1980 The role of foreign powers in the history of Lebanon and Syria from 1799 to 1861 Journal of Asian History 14. Seale Patrick 1987. The Struggle for Syria. Yale University Press. ISBN 9780300039443. External links Syria at Wikipedias sister projects Definitions from Wiktionary Media from Commons News from Wikinews Quotations from Wikiquote Texts from Wikisource Textbooks from Wikibooks Resources from Wikiversity Travel information from Wikivoyage Syria. The World Factbook. Central Intelligence Agency. Syria at Curlie Syria web resources provided by GovPubs at the University of Colorado Boulder Libraries Syria profile from the BBC News Syria profiles of people and institutions provided by the Arab Decision project Wikimedia Atlas of Syria v t e Syria articles History Timeline Years in Syria Prehistorical Syria Levantine corridor Natufian culture Halaf culture Uruk period Abu Hureyra Aswad Yarmukian culture Ancient Syria Amorites Akkadian Empire Arameans Canaanites Middle Assyrian Empire Ebla Yamhad Qatna Mari Ugarit AramDamascus SyroHittite states NeoAssyrian Empire NeoBabylonian Empire Achaemenid Syria Seleucid Syria Roman Syria Palmyrene Empire Byzantine Syria Medieval Syria Muslim conquest 636 Caliphal Syria Bilad alSham Tulunid dynasty Ikhshidid dynasty Zangid dynasty Hamdanid dynasty Mirdasid dynasty Fatimid Syria Saljuqid Syria Crusader states County of Edessa Principality of Antioch County of Tripoli Ayyubid Syria 11741260 Mamluk Syria 12601516 Early modern Syria Ottoman Syria 15161918 Modern Syria Arab kingdom 1920 Haj Fadel Government French Mandate Syrian Federation 192225 State of Syria 192530 Mandatory Republic 193046 independent First Republic 194650 Second Republic 19501963 Civil war Geography Borders Cities Districts Governorates Rivers Volcanoes Features AlJazira AntiLebanon Mountains Euphrates Golan Heights Hauran Hermon Orontes Syrian Desert Related Syria region Southern Syria Fertile Crescent Levant Politics Constitution Corruption President list Vice President Council of Ministers Prime Minister list Elections Foreign relations Golan Heights claim Iskandaron Government ministries Human rights LGBT Judiciary High council Supreme Constitutional Court Parliament Speakers Political parties Arab Socialist Baath Party national  regional command National Progressive Front Popular Front for Change and Liberation Political status of the Golan Heights Nationalism Greater Syria Terrorism Military Army Air force air defense Navy Chief of the General Staff Weapons of mass destruction Economy Agriculture Central Bank Companies Industry International rankings Pound currency Securities Exchange stock exchange Infrastructure Energy and mineral resources Petroleum industry Telecommunications Transport Water supply and sanitation Society Censorship Demographics Education Health Hunger People diaspora refugees 20
11 present women Public holidays Scouting Squatting Culture Anthem Coat of arms Cuisine wine Films Flag Media State television Music Religion Smoking Outline Index Category Geographic locale v t e Countries and territories of the Mediterranean Sea Sovereign states Albania Algeria Bosnia and Herzegovina Croatia Cyprus Egypt France Greece Israel Italy Lebanon Libya Malta Monaco Montenegro Morocco Slovenia Spain Syria Tunisia Turkey States with limited recognition Northern Cyprus Palestine Dependencies and other territories Akrotiri and Dhekelia UK Gibraltar UK Marginal seas Adriatic Sea Aegean Sea Alboran Sea Balearic Sea Ionian Sea Levantine Sea Libyan Sea Ligurian Sea Sea of Crete Sea of Marmara Sea of Sardinia Thracian Sea Tyrrhenian Sea v t e Middle East Countries Bahrain Cyprus Egypt Iran Iraq Iraqi Kurdistan Israel Jordan Kuwait Lebanon Northern Cyprus Oman Palestine Gaza West Bank Qatar Saudi Arabia Syria North Syria Federation Turkish occupation of northern Syria Turkey United Arab Emirates Yemen Society Climate change Democracy Economy Energy History Timeline Modern conflicts Human rights Water politics Water conflict Demographics Ethnic groups Genetics Metropolitan areas Religion Irreligion Culture Archaeology Cinema Cuisine Etiquette Music Dance Studies v t e Countries and regions in the Arabian Plate Countries Bahrain Djibouti Iraq Israel Jordan Kuwait Lebanon Oman Palestine Qatar Saudi Arabia Syria United Arab Emirates Regions Khuzestan Province Southeastern Anatolia Region Southern Denkalya Subregion Awdal South Sinai Governorate v t e Countries and dependencies of Asia Sovereign states Afghanistan Armenia2 Azerbaijan1 Bahrain Bangladesh Bhutan Brunei Cambodia China Cyprus2 East Timor Egypt1 Georgia1 India Indonesia1 Iran Iraq Israel Japan Jordan Kazakhstan1 North Korea South Korea Kuwait Kyrgyzstan Laos Lebanon Malaysia Maldives Mongolia Myanmar Nepal Oman Pakistan Philippines Qatar Russia1 Saudi Arabia Singapore Sri Lanka Syria Tajikistan Thailand Turkey1 Turkmenistan United Arab Emirates Uzbekistan Vietnam Yemen States with limited recognition Abkhazia2 Northern Cyprus2 Palestine South Ossetia2 Taiwan Dependent territories Australia Christmas Island Cocos Keeling Islands Greece Kastellorizo United Kingdom Akrotiri and Dhekelia2 Sovereign Base Areas British Indian Ocean Territory British Overseas Territory Special administrative regions of China Hong Kong Macau 1 Spans the conventional boundary between Asia and another continent. 2 Considered European for cultural political and historical reasons but is geographically in Western Asia. Category Asia portal International membership v t e Arab League Arab League Lists Politics Charter Council Flag Geography Headquarters History Military Joint Defence Council Parliament Arab Union Membership Members Algeria Bahrain Comoros Djibouti Egypt Iraq Jordan Kuwait Lebanon Libya Mauritania Morocco Oman Palestine Qatar Saudi Arabia Somalia Sudan Syria Tunisia United Arab Emirates Yemen Observers Armenia Brazil Eritrea India Venezuela Candidates South Sudan Diplomacy Arab Peace Initiative Arab League monitors in Syria Arab LeagueEuropean Union relations Foreign relations Life Demographics Economy GDP Economic and Social Council Institutions Sport PanArabism Union of Arab National Olympic Committees Pan Arab Games v t e Organisation of Islamic Cooperation OIC SecretaryGeneral of the Organisation of Islamic Cooperation Hissein Brahim Taha Member states Members Afghanistan Albania Algeria Azerbaijan Bahrain Bangladesh Benin Burkina Faso Brunei Cameroon Chad Comoros Djibouti Egypt Gabon Gambia Guinea GuineaBissau Guyana Indonesia Iran Iraq Ivory Coast Jordan Kazakhstan Kuwait Kyrgyzstan Lebanon Libya Malaysia Maldives Mali Mauritania Morocco Mozambique Niger Nigeria Oman Pakistan PakistanOIC relations Palestine Qatar Saudi Arabia Senegal Sierra Leone Somalia Sudan Suriname Tajikistan Togo Tunisia Turkey Turkmenistan Uganda Uzbekistan United Arab Emirates Yemen Suspended Syria Observers Countries and territories Bosnia and Herzegovina Central African Republic Northern Cyprus1 Russia Thailand Muslim communities Moro National Liberation Front International organizations Economic Cooperation Organization African Union Arab League NonAligned Movement United Nations History Declarations Abuja Declaration 1989 Cairo Declaration on Human Rights in Islam 1990 OIC Resolution 1011 2008 OIC Council of Foreign Ministers Resolution 1037 2010 Sessions Extraordinary First Second Third Fourth Fifth Sixth Seventh Eighth Ninth ArabIslamic 2023 Demographics Economy GDP GDP per capita Exports Imports Population Largest cities Education 1 As the Turkish Cypriot State. Authority control databases International FAST ISNI 2 VIAF National Spain France 2 3 BnF data 2 3 Germany Israel United States Japan Czech Republic Croatia Geographic MusicBrainz area People UK Parliament Other Historical Dictionary of Switzerland NARA IdRef slm Ansiklopedisi 
35 N 
38 E  
35 N 
38 E  35 38 Retrieved from httpsen.wikipedia.orgwindex.phptitleSyriaoldid1222988817 Categories Syria Countries in Asia Countries and territories where Arabic is an official language Kurdishspeaking countries and territories Eastern Mediterranean Levant Arab republics Member states of the Arab League Member states of the United Nations Middle Eastern countries States and territories established in 1946 Military dictatorships Totalitarian states West Asian countries 1946 establishments in Asia Baathist states Hidden categories Articles containing Arabiclanguage text CS1 maint multiple names authors list CS1 maint location Source attribution CS1 Frenchlanguage sources fr Webarchive template wayback links All articles with dead external links Articles with dead external links from July 2023 Articles with permanently dead external links CS1 maint numeric names authors list CS1 errors missing periodical Harv and Sfn notarget errors Articles with dead external links from March 2017 Pages containing links to subscriptiononly content CS1 maint others CS1 Spanishlanguage sources es Articles with short description Short description is different from Wikidata Wikipedia indefinitely semiprotected pages Wikipedia indefinitely moveprotected pages Use dmy dates from January 2020 Articles containing Greeklanguage text Articles containing Phoenicianlanguage text Pages using multiple image with auto scaled images Wikipedia external links cleanup from November 2021 Wikipedia spam cleanup from November 2021 Wikipedia articles in need of updating from February 2018 All Wikipedia articles in need of updating All articles with unsourced statements Articles with unsourced statements from January 2023 All accuracy disputes Articles with disputed statements from April 2018 Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2015 All articles containing potentially dated statements Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2012 Pages using Sister project links with hidden wikidata Pages using Sister project links with default search Articles with Curlie links Articles with FAST identifiers Articles with ISNI identifiers Articles with VIAF identifiers Articles with BNE identifiers Articles with BNF identifiers Articles with BNFdata identifiers Articles with GND identifiers Articles with J
9 U identifiers Articles with LCCN identifiers Articles with NDL identifiers Articles with NKC identifiers Articles with NSK identifiers Articles with MusicBrainz area identifiers Articles with UKPARL identifiers Articles with HDS identifiers Articles with NARA identifiers Articles with SUDOC identifiers Articles with TDVA identifiers Coordinates on Wikidata This page was last edited on 9 May 2024 at 0517 UTC. Text is available under the Creative Commons AttributionShareAlike License 
4.0  additional terms may apply. By using this site you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation Inc. a nonprofit organization. Privacy policy About Wikipedia Disclaimers Contact Wikipedia Code of Conduct Developers Statistics Cookie statement Mobile view Toggle limited content width